G. POLICE COOPERATION 

1. Please provide information on legislation or other rules governing the police and police cooperation, and their adhesion to relevant international conventions. 
Laws related to the police and its duties in the Republic of Macedonia and to police cooperation are the following: 
  Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04);    Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 58/00 and 44/02);   Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02. 43/03 and 19/04);   Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/1997, 44/2002 and 74/2004);   Law on Public Peace and Order Disturbances (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/72, 29/83, 51/88, 19/90 and 26/93);   Law on Misdemeanours (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97);   Law on Traffic Road Safety (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 14/98, 38/02 and 38/04);   Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03);   Law on Law on Movement and Residence of Aliens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 26/93 and 45/02);   Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Borderzone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 12/93, 11/94 and 19/04);    Law on Weapons (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 7/05);    Law on Securing Persons and Property (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 80/99);   Law on Travel Documents of the Citizens of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 67/92, 20/03 and 46/04);   Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, Nos. 52/56, 10/65, 4/77, 11/78 and 9/86; and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/02);    Law on Administrative Disputes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 4/77 and 44/02);   Law on Public Gatherings (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/95);   Law on Classified Information (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/04);    Law on Personal Data Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 7/05);   Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02);   Law on Prevention of Laundering Money and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04); and other laws. 
To perform the tasks within the competence of the Ministry of the Interior, the officers of the Ministry act in accordance with the following secondary legislation:  
  Decree on the Use of Means of Coercion and Firearms (““Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,” Nos. 22/98 and 17/04);    Rulebook on Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior ( “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/98 and 15/03);   Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 3/04; see 24_Annex_05);    Rulebook on the Mode of Storing and Protecting Documents, Reports, Data and other acts of the Ministry of the Interior which by Virtue of Law, other Regulations or a Decision by a Competent Body are Designated as State, Military or Business Secret (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 48/95 and 34/03);    Rulebook on the Performance of Duties of the State Security and Counterintelligence Directorate (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/98);    Rulebook on the Performance of Duties of the Internal Control and Professional Standards Sector at the Ministry of the Interior;    Rules for Conduct and Mutual Relations between Employees with Special Tasks and Authorities at the Ministry of the Interior;   Rules on the Treatment of Temporarily Impounded and Found Objects by Authorised Officials of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 56/1995);   Rulebook on the Control of State Border Crossing, Movement and Stay at Border Crossing Points and Records Keeping (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/92);   Decision Designating Protected Persons and Facilities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 88/02). The Law on Internal Affairs, in Article 44, explicitly provides that in the performance of the duties within its competence, the Ministry can cooperate and exchange information with foreign police and state authorities, organisations from other states and international organisations in the area of the internal affairs. The Republic of Macedonia, as a member-state of the United Nations and the Council of Europe has signed and ratified the following international conventions related to the police and the police cooperation:  Council of Europe Conventions 
  European Convention for the Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment and Protocol No. 1 and Protocol No. 2 to the Convention. (The Convention and the Protocols were signed on 14.06.1996, ratified on 06.06.1997 and entered into force on 01 October 1997 – the Convention, and 01.03.2003 – the Protocols);   European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters, with the Additional Protocol;  (the Convention and the Protocol were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07 1999 and entered into force 26.10.1999);   Convention on Cybercrime;(The Convention was signed on 23.11.2001, ratified on 15.09 2004, and entered into force 01.01.2005);   European Convention on Extradition with the additional Protocol No 1 and Protocol No 2 to the Convention. (The Convention and the Protocols were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999);   Convention on the Transfer of Sentenced Persons with the additional Protocol to the Convention (The Convention and the Protocols were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999);   Criminal Law Convention on Corruption.  (The Convention was signed on 06.06.2000, ratified on 21.11.2002 and entered into force 01.11.2003);   Additional Protocol to the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (signed on 15.05.2003);   Civil Law Convention on Corruption (signed on 08.06.2000; ratified on 29.11.2002, and entered into force on 01.11.2003);   Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime.  (The Convention was signed on 14.12.1999, ratified on 19.05.2000 and entered into force 01.09.2000);   European Convention on the Suppression of Terrorism.  (The Convention was signed on 08 November 2001, ratified on 29 November 2004 and will enter into force on 01.03. 2005);   Protocol amending the European Convention on the Suppression of Terrorism (signed on 15.05.2003);   Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime.  (The Convention was signed on 14.12.1999, ratified on 19.05.2000, and will enter into force on 01.03. 2005);    Convention for Protection of Individuals with Regard to Automatic Processing of Personal Data No. 108 of the Council of Europe of 28.01.1981. (The Convention was signed on and ratified by the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05); 
UN Conventions  
  International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, adopted on 19.12.1966 (Official Gazette of the Peoples Republic of Macedonia, International  Agreement, - 7/71-73);   International Convention for the Suppression of Terrorist Bombings  (The Convention was signed on 16.12.1998, and ratified on 06.05.2004);   International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism  (The Convention was signed on 31.01.2000, and ratified on 06.05.2004);   Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Seizure of Aircraft (of 07.01.1998, acceded to by succession);    Convention on Offences and Certain Other Acts Committed on Board Aircraft  (of 30.08.1994, acceded to by succession);   Convention on the Physical Protection of Nuclear Material  (of 20.09.1996, acceded to by succession);   Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Civil Aviation  (of 04.01.1995, acceded to by succession);   Protocol for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts of Violence at Airports Serving International Civil Aviation, Supplementary to the Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Civil Aviation  (of 04.01.1995, acceded to by succession);   Convention on the marking of plastic explosives for the purpose of detection  (of 21.09.1998, acceded to by succession);   Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of Crimes against Internationally Protected Persons, including Diplomatic Agents  (Entered into force on 17.11.1991, acceded to by succession on 29.01.1998);   Convention on the Safety of United Nations and Associated Personnel (The Convention was signed on 06.03.2002, ratification procedure is under way);   Convention for the Suppression of the Traffic in Human Beings and of the Exploitation of the Prostitution of Others, adopted on 21 March 1950 (“Official Journal of SFRY”, International Agreements,  2/51-39) (The Republic of Macedonia acceded to the Convention by succession);   Convention relating to the Status of Refugees, adopted on 28.08.1951   Protocol relating to the Status of Refugees, adopted on 31.01.1967  (The Convention and the Protocols were acceded to by succession, and the Republic of Macedonia ratified them in 1994);   International Convention against the Taking of Hostages  (Entered into force on 17.11.1991, acceded to by succession on 29.01.1998);    United Nations Convention against Transnational Organised Crime     Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Human Beings, Especially Women and Children   Additional Protocol against the Smuggling of Migrants by Land, Sea and Air  (The Convention and the Protocols were signed on 12.12.2000, ratified on 28.09.2004). In October 1993 the Republic of Macedonia acceded, on the basis of succession, to the following conventions:   Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs of 1961, amended by Protocol of 1972;    Convention on Psychotropic Substances of 1971;    Convention against the Illicit Traffic in Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances of 1988;  Besides the aforementioned conventions of the Council of Europe and the United Nations, the Republic of Macedonia, in regulating the police operation and police cooperation is guided also by the generally accepted international principles, incorporated in the following documents:   Declaration of Basic Principles of Justice for Victims of Crime and Abuse of Power (UN Resolution 40/34- 1985 adopted on 29.11.1985);   Code of Conduct for Law Enforcement Officials (UN Resolution 34/169/1979 adopted on 17.12.1979); and   Council of Europe Declaration on the Police (Resolution 690- 1979 adopted on 8.05 1979). Specific agreement that also have impact on police work and cooperation are the following:      Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union concerning the status of forces led by the European Union in the Republic of Macedonia (signed on 26.03.2003);   Agreement on the Multinational Peace Force South-Eastern Europe with the Additional Protocol (The Agreement was concluded on 26.09.1998). 
INTERPOL On the 62 INTERPOL General Assembly, which took place in Aruba in 1993, the Republic of Macedonia acceded to the International Criminal Police Organisation – INTERPOL. The Republic of Macedonia fulfils all obligations based on this membership and respects the statutary norms and regulations of INTERPOL. The ratified international conventions, according to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, are a part of the internal legal order and can not be changed by law. The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04), as one of the laws by which the police abides when undertaking measures within its legally defined responsibilities, is aligned with relevant international conventions. The United Nations Convention against the Transnational Organised Crime with the Protocols to it is implemented in  the Law on Criminal Procedure, articles 270- a and 270- b which regulate the procedure of protection of witnesses, collaborators of justice and of victims, and also in the provisions of the Criminal Code which regulate the procedure for enforcement of the measure ‘temporary securing of property’ and assets linked to the criminal offence, and which deal with temporary freezing, seizure, withholding of funds, bank accounts, financial transactions or proceeds from crime  (Article 203 - Article 208). Liability of legal persons, instituted in the Article 10 of the United Nations Convention Against Transnational Organised Crime is incorporated in the Articles 477-a - 477-l of the Law on Criminal Procedure, while the application of the special investigative techniques which are an efficient means for suppression of organised crime (Article 20 of the Convention) are incorporated in the Articles 142- b- 142- f of the Law on Criminal Procedure. The aforementioned Convention is implemented in the Criminal Code, as well, by establishment of the criminal offence Trafficking in human beings (Article 418- ), Smuggling of migrants (Article 418- b), Laundering money and other proceeds from crime (Article 273), in the provisions dealing with the confiscation of property and proceeds and seizure of objects (article 97- article 100), as well as in the provisions specifying sanctions for the legal persons (Article 96- - 96- f). The extradition (Article 15 of the Convention), the transfer of sentenced persons, (Article 17 of the Convention), mutual legal assistance (Article 18 of the Convention) are transposed in the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, stipulating the procedure of extradition of accused and sentenced persons and the procedure for transfer of sentenced persons (Article 509- 525-b), as well as in the procedure for provision of international legal assistance and enforcement of international agreements related to criminal law cases (Article 502- 508).  The Convention on Cybercrime is incorporated in the Criminal Code, as follows: Article 149- Prevention of access to a public IT system, Article 251 Damaging and unauthorised misuse of a computer system, Article 251-  Creation and spreading of computer viruses, Article 251- b Computer fraud.   The provisions from the European Convention on the Suppression of Terrorism are incorporated in the Article 313 of the Criminal Code, which prescribes the Terrorism as a criminal offence, in the Article 419 which sanctions the International terrorism as a criminal offence and in the Article 394-(terrorist organisation).  The provisions of the Rome Statute are incorporated in the Criminal Code, in Article 366-Presentation of false evidence, Article 368-  Illegal influencing of witnesses, Article 394- Terrorist organisation, Article 403- Crime against the humanity, Article 407-  Approval or justification of genocide, crimes against humanity or war crimes, Article 407- b Abuse of chemical or biological weapons, Article 416-a Organising a group and conspiracy to commit genocide and war crimes, Article 416-b Command responsibility and Article 416- c Responsibility of the subordinates for an act committed upon an order of the superior. The definitions of the criminal offence Receiving bribe (Article 357 of the Criminal Code) and of the criminal offence Giving bribe (Article 358 of the Criminal Code) which establishes corruption as a crime, are in conformity with the provisions of the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption, the Civil Law Convention on Corruption, as well as the Convention drawn up on the basis of Article K.3 of the Treaty on European Union, on the protection of the European Communities’ financial interests, the First and the Second Protocol to the Convention. Provisions of the aforementioned international conventions are furthermore incorporated o in the Law on Prevention of Corruption, which incriminate Bribing of voters (Article 14), Favourism or discrimination after the elections (Article 15), Influencing the election, appointment or dismissal to managerial posts (Article 16), and Influencing employment of close relatives (Article 29).  The provisions of the European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters, with the Additional Protocol, and the Second Additional Protocol to the European Convention of Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters, are incorporated in the Articles 502 to 508 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) which regulate the procedure of rendering international legal assistance and enforcement of international agreements regarding criminal cases. Article 502 of the Law on Criminal Procedure contains an explicit guarantee that the international assistance in criminal matters is rendered pursuant to the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, unless specified otherwise by the provisions of the European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters with the protocols to it, the United Nations Convention on Transnational Organised Crime or other international documents ratified in accordance to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. Pursuant to Article 503 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the requests of the domestic courts for international legal assistance in criminal cases are communicated to the foreign bodies through diplomatic channels. In the same way, the domestic courts are submitted the requests for legal assistance from the foreign bodies. However, in emergency cases, if reciprocity is established, the requests for legal assistance can be submitted through the Ministry of the Interior. The European Convention on Extradition, together with the Additional Protocol and the Second Additional Protocol, as well as the Convention on the Transfer of Sentenced Persons with the additional Protocol to the Convention are incorporated in the Articles 509- 525 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, which stipulate the extradition procedure for the accused and sentenced persons, and the procedure for transfer of the sentenced persons. The Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime is incorporated through the introduction of the offence Laundering money and other illegal proceeds (Article 273 of the Criminal Code) and in the Articles 203-  to 207 of the Law on Criminal Procedure.  The Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/2003) governs the conditions and procedure for recognition and cancellation of the right to asylum to an alien and a stateless person, who request recognition of the right to asylum in the Republic of Macedonia, as well as the rights and the duties of the asylum-seekers and the persons who are recognised the right to asylum in the Republic of Macedonia. The Law  provided for harmonisation of the domestic legislation to the Convention on the Status of Refugees of 1951 and the Protocol on the Status of Refugees of 1967. Implementing the provisions of the Article 3 of the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms of 1950 and Article 3 of the Convention against Torture and Other Cruel, Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment of 1894, the Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection guarantees the right to asylum, under conditions and within a procedure established by this law.  The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds of Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) implements the provisions of the UN Convention against Transnational Organised Crime, the Council Directive on Prevention of the Use of the Financial System for the Purpose of Money Laundering 91/38/EEC and the European Union Directive 2001/97- EEC, The 40 FATF Recommendations and Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing, adopted by FATF).  The provisions of Article 8 of the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, which is ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on 27.02.1997 are incorporated in the Draft Law on Interception of Communications, which is in parliamentary procedure. The new Law on Protection of Personal Data is harmonised with the Directive of the European Parliament and the Council 95/46/ of 1995 for the Protection of Individuals with regard to Processing of their Personal Data.  A new Law on Aliens is being drafted, which should align domestic legislation with European standards. In defining conditions under which the aliens can enter, reside and leave the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, the provisions from the following European legislation, as well as international instruments are being transposed: Convention Implementing the Schengen Agreement of 14.06.1985; the Common Consular Instructions (CCI) on Visas for the Diplomatic Missions and Consular Posts with the Annexes; Council Decision of 22 December 2003 amending the third subparagraph (Basic criteria for examining applications) of Part V of the Common Consular Instructions; Council Decision 2004/17/EC amending Part V, point 1.4., of the Common Consular Instructions and Part I, point 4.1.2, of the Common Manual as regards inclusion of the requirement to be in possession of travel medical insurance as one of the supporting documents for the grant of a uniform entry visa; the Council decision of 29 April 2004 to amend the General Consular Rules with the introduction of a provision on border control of the accompanied minors; the Council Resolution of 26 June 1997 on unaccompanied minors who are nationals of third countries; the Council Directive of 17.12.2003 on residence permits issued to third country nationals who are victims of trafficking in human beings or who are subjects of an action for facilitation of illegal migration who cooperate with the competent authorities; the Council Resolution of 04.03.1996 on the status of third country nationals residing on a long-term basis in the territory of the Member States; Council Resolution of 30.11.1994 on the admission of third-country nationals to the territory of the Member States for study purposes; the Council Directive of 28. 05.2001 on the mutual recognition of decisions on the expulsion of third country nationals; Council Directive of 22.09.2003 on the right of third country nationals residing lawfully in the territory of the Member States to family reunification; Council Directive of 25.11.2003 concerning the status of third-country nationals who are long-term residents; the Council Decision of 03.12.1998 on the common standards for filling in the uniform format for residence permits; Recommendations and Best Practices of February 2002 regarding controls and surveillance at external borders, expulsion and re-admission; and many others.  2. How are the law enforcement agencies organised (ministries responsible, structure, manpower, horizontal co-operation structures, budget)? What are the laws, regulations and administrative rules incumbent on the police and the exercise of police functions? 
Ministry of the Interior 
The internal affairs on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia are under the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior - a state administration body headed by a Minister of the Interior. According to the current (yet actually transitory) establishment, the organisational bodies of the Ministry of the Interior in charge of public and state security are: the Bureau for Public Security and the Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence, managed by Directors. (The organigram of the new structure of the Ministry, according to the Strategy for Police Reform is presented in 24_Annex_4).     The public security affairs are under the competencies of the Bureau for Public Security, organised in the Department for Police, Department for Criminal Police, and Department for Border Police. Since January 2005, the newly established Department for Organised Crime has become operational.   The Department for Police is in charge of maintaining the public peace and order, road traffic control and regulation, as well as safety at lakes and other tasks that require engagement of uniformed police. The Department has organisational units in charge of: public peace and order, road traffic safety, external security of facilities, etc.  The Department for Criminal Police is in charge of crime prevention, detection and apprehension of perpetrators of crimes, forensics and other issues as set forth in the Law on Internal Affairs. The Department has its organisational units dealing with: ordinary crime, international police cooperation, drugs, arms, organised crime and forensics.  In the process of implementation of the Action Plan for the Reform of the Police, the Department for Criminal Police is being transformed. A new Department for Organised Crime has already been established. Its scope of duties include detection of corruption and severe types of economic and financial crime.      The Department for Border Police is in charge of state border protection, border crossing control, establishing border incidents and other state border violations, as well as other tasks set forth in law. The Department has its organisational units dealing with: analysis, border crossing points, state border surveillance, operations, border police operation support, Euro-integration issues in the context of cross-border cooperation, foreign aid coordination.  Certain tasks such as analysis and research, securing of persons and internal securing of facilities, aliens and immigration issues, preparation for defence operations, are performed by separate organisational units of the Bureau for Public Security.  The duties within the competencies of the Bureau for Public Security are performed by staff with special duties and powers (authorised officials) and civil servants without police authorities.  Duties in the context of state security such as protection from espionage, terrorism and from other acts aimed at threatening or destroying, by use of means of violence, the democratic institutions established under the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as protection from serious forms of organised crime are under the competencies of the Directorate for State Security and Counter- Intelligence. The Ministry of the Interior has certain common organisational units which perform tasks both for the Bureau for Public Security and for the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence such as: the Public Relations Office, Sector for Anti-Terrorism, Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, Sector for International Cooperation and European Integration, Sector for Financial and Common Affairs, Sector for Legal and Personnel affairs, Sector for Telecommunications, Crypto-Protection and IT, Sector for Administrative and Supervisory Duties and Sector for Reintegration. The activities of the abovementioned organisational units are performed by staff with special duties and authorities (authorised officials) and civil servants.  On the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia there are 12 regional organisational units established- Sectors for Internal Affairs which are organised depending on the size of the covering area, the number of inhabitants in the given area, the crime and misdemeanour rates and other criteria. These Sectors are managed by Heads of Sectors. The Sectors have 23 Internal Affairs Units in total. There are one or several police stations, headed by Chiefs of Police Stations, covering one or several municipalities, established for the performance of field police and other internal affairs activities. With the implementation of the reforms in the police, the number of regional organisational units (sectors) should be decreased to 8.      The Ministry of the Interior has a total number of 12.462 employees. Out of them 8216 are uniformed police officers, 1205 authorised officials at the Criminal Police, 508 authorised officials are in the Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence, 750 staff at the Units for Regional Fire Protection and 1.777 employees working on other tasks at the Ministry.  It should be noted that in the line of the decentralisation process the competence for fire protection wil be be transferred to the municipalities.  The implementation of the ongoing Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03) has resulted in changes in the structure and competencies of the police forces, which have been taking place in stages. For more details see 24_G_06The Ministry of the Interior is financed by the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The structure of revenues is the following: original revenues established in the Budget, revenues accumulated by the Ministry and revenues from additional self-financing activities. In accordance with the relevant legislation, budget allocations and other revenues are transferred to three accounts of the Ministry: the budget account, revenue account and self-financing account.  The 2004 Budget of the Republic of Macedonia for the Ministry of the Interior for 2005 amounts to 6.667.599.000 MKD (in the 2004 it amounted to 5.677.838, 000 MKD). Envisaged are three budgetary programmes of the Ministry: Administration (99.035.000), Security (5.775.827.000) and the Police Academy (44.841.000). The Progamme for the administration provides the funds for the administrative support to the functions of the Ministry, support to the legislation and coordination of the functions within the Ministry. The Budget Programme Security reflects the basic functions of the Ministry. The funds for the Police Academy are earmarked for training of police personnel, continuous training of the police officers and academic and research activity. Besides these programmes, for the Ministry of the Interior funds from the governmental programmes which are of priority for the Government are allocated. Within these priorities, under the Programme for Enhancement of the Defence and the Security, 336.081.000 MKD are allocated for Border Police. This Programme includes the expenditures for security and control of the border of all the borders of the Republic of Macedonia. The Public Prosecutor’s Office 
The Public Prosecutor’s Office is a single and autonomous state body that prosecutes perpetrators of crimes and of other offences punishable by law.  In the performance of activities related to prosecution of perpetrators of crime and other punishable offences, the Public Prosecutor has the authority to:    Undertake necessary measures and legal means to prosecute crimes and other punishable offences and their perpetrators and to direct the preliminary procedure;    Undertake all procedural actions within the basic function of the Public Prosecutor of instituting and presenting indictments;    Decide on initiating or continuing criminal prosecution against perpetrators of crimes;    Present regular and extraordinary legal remedies against court decisions;    Is responsible for consistent execution of sanctions pronounced for punishable acts, as well as of the protection of the rights of persons to whom detention has been pronounced, and perform other activities prescribed by law. The functions of the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia are performed by Public Prosecutors as follows: the Office of the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia, Offices of Higher Public Prosecutors (3 in total) and Offices of Basic Public Prosecutors (22 in total).  Public Prosecutors have one or several Deputies. The Deputy Public Prosecutors may undertake all actions under the competencies of the Public Prosecutor’s Office set forth by law, in proceedings before courts, other bodies and legal entities.  The Public Prosecutors’ Offices are established for the area of jurisdiction of courts of certain instance, before which the Public Prosecutors’ Office acts. One Basic Public Prosecutor’s Office may be established for the area of jurisdiction of one or several basic courts.  Higher Public Prosecutors’ Offices are established to cover the area of jurisdiction of the Appelate Courts.  The Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia is established for the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia, and is seated in Skopje.  Public Prosecutor’s Offices that deal with significant number of similar cases can establish units as internal organisational entities, in order to enhance the efficiency and specialise in relevant field of work of the Office. Such units are headed by the relevant Public Prosecutor or a Deputy Public Prosecutor designated under the Annual Work Plan of the Public Prosecutor’s Office.  The Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia has established a Unit for fight against Organised Crime. This Unit processes criminal cases prosecuted ex officio perpetrated by an organised group of at least three persons, acting for a given period of time, in order to gain direct or indirect financial benefit or other material proceeds and that perpetrate one or several crimes for which the law prescribes a prison sentence of at least four years.  The operation of the offices of the Public Prosecutor is funded from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, i.e. budget funds are allocated to the budget beneficiary - the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Budget for 2005 of the Republic of Macedonia for the Public Prosecutor’s Office foresees 195.069.000 MKD, structured within a single programme, while the Budget for 2004 amounted to 188.361.000 MKD. Besides that, within the Government’s programme “Rule of Law” – reform of the judiciary, 10.000.000 MKD for capital expenditure are allocated for 2005.  
Customs Administration  
The Customs Administration is a state administrative body within the Ministry of Finance with the capacity of a separate legal entity. It has specific competencies in the fight against organised crime, implementing its functions of a law enforcement state body through the Sector for Control and Investigations. The Customs Administration has authorities of a law-enforcment agency in customs-related offences, identified in the Customs Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 21/98, 63/98, 86/99, 25/00, 109/00, 31/01, 4/02, 55/02, and 42/03).   The general organisational set up of the Customs Administration is regulated in the Customs Administration Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/2004), while the internal organisational set up is defined in the Rulebook on Organisation and Operation of the Customs Administration No. 02-545/1, dated 9 March 2004 and the Rulebook amending and supplementing the Rulebook on the Organisation and Operation of the Customs Administration No. 02-545/1, dated 22 September 2004, adopted by the Minister of Finance.  The Customs Administration, with Headquarters in Skopje, performs the activities under its competencies on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia, through its regional offices.  The activities within the scope of competencies of the Customs Administration are performed by the following units:    Central Headquarters, which coordinates and manages the customs administration activities on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia; and the    Customs Houses which are established depending on the volume and structure of the foreign goods and passenger traffic.  The Central Administration has six Sectors, organised in 18 Units and 17 Offices, and 3 separate Units. Within one of these departments there is a Customs Coordination Unit and the General Director’s Advisors’ Office.  There are 5 Customs Houses as regional units, having 5 services, 39 customs offices, which have a total number of 12 sections.  Most customs offices and customs sections are established at border crossings for passenger, railway and air traffic, while the others are inland customs offices and sections for import/export customs clearance.  The total number of posts envisaged in the Rulebook on the Systematisation of Posts at the Customs Administration is 997, 360 of which are at the Central Administration and 637 at the Customs Houses.  Out of the total number of envisaged posts, 844 have been filled. After the latest reforms of the organisational structure of the Customs Administration, a Sector for Professional Standards has been established, which following completed recruitment and training, performs daily control of the work of the Central Administration and the regional units for purposes of supervising the application of laws, application of prescribed procedures, performance of competencies and tasks. Accordingly, prevention, detection and elimination of misconduct, fraud, losses, abuse and mismanagement in the organisational units of the Customs Administration is improved. Such offences are processed in accordance with the Labour Relations Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 14/95, 53/97, 21/98, 25/00, 3/01, 50/01, 25/03 and 40/03), in accordance with the Customs Administration Law, Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03 and 17/04) and the Collective Agreement of the Custom Administration No. 01-1984/1, dated 17.03.2003 adopted and signed by the Director of the Customs Administration and the President of the Trade Union at the Customs Administration, under which disciplinary measures can be pronounced.  A Sector for Human Resource Management has also been established, with a new function and clearly defined objectives, role and responsibilities related to the operative strategy, as well as the five year plan and the operative plan. In cooperation with the Customs and Fiscal Assistance Office (CAFAO MAK) and with the support of other foreign aid, in pursuance with the Customs Administration Law, by-laws are being drafted under which new systems compatible with the EU standards in terms of recruitment, assessment, and management of the job performance, career advancement, training, dismissal from work, pensions, salaries, award system, and working conditions, will be introduced.   Another new Unit is the Internal Audit Unit, which in terms of its hierarchical set up is accountable to the Director of the Customs Administration, and is tasked with planning, organising and performing audits in accordance with the laws, international audit standards and the established auditing policies of the Ministry of Finance, following the demands of the World Bank Mission  in connection with the approval of the PSAL (Public Sector Adjustment Loan) and the PSMAL (Public Sector Management Adjustment Loan) arrangements.  The 2005 Budget of the Republic of Macedonia has the following allocations for the Customs Administration: revenues and expenditures - salaries, wages and benefits (net basic salaries and wages, contributions and personal income tax paid at source) services and goods (travel costs and current expenditures, utilities, heating, transport and communications, materials, current maintenance, services under contracts and other operative expenditures, current transfers and subsidies (transfers to households and natural persons) interest payment (foreign debt payment), procurement of capital assets (procurement of office furniture and equipment, construction, reconstruction and improvement) and capital transfers ( capital transfers to government institutions).  The 2005 Budget of the Customs Administration is 507.322.000 MKD. (In the year 2004 the Budget amounted to 523.262.000 MKD).  
Financial Police 
The Financial Police is a body within the Ministry of Finance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02), with specific law - enforcement authority, related to financial crime and specified in the Law on Financial Police. The Financial Police is a specialised body, which performs control over the application of the tax and customs regulations, detection of serious crimes of tax evasions, money laundering, banking and insurance frauds, smuggling, serious forms of corruption, financing of terrorism, control of suspicious concluded contracts, control of game of chance, suspicious loans and credits and other types of crimes of avoiding payment of significant amounts of customs duties, excise taxes or other public fees prescribed by law, connected with the financial aspect of the crime, material proceeds and tracking the money, resulting from violation of laws and regulations or international treaties.  Pursuant to the Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02) the Financial Police operates on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The Financial Police is managed by a Director, and the activities are performed by 9 financial police officers, appointed and dismissed by the Minster of Finance, upon the proposal of the Director of the Financial Police.  The Financial Police has two Departments: Department for Information Gathering and Case Development and Department for Police Investigations.  The Department for Information Gathering and Case Development gathers data about potential perpetrators of financial crimes, in cooperation with other bodies within the Ministry of Finance and its sectors, and especially in cooperation with the Public Revenue Office, the Customs Administration, and the Ministry of the Interior, the Public Prosecutor’s Office, the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption, and other state administration authorities and legal entities, as well as with citizens, the media or uses direct information from financial police officers. The data are registered and analysed in order to establish grounds for suspicion that a financial crime has been committed and to asses whether it is necessary to further investigate the case through police investigation.  The Department of Police Investigations undertakes preliminary or complete police investigation in cases in which there are reasonable grounds to suspect that a person or several persons have committed a crime of tax evasion, money laundering, corruption or other financial crimes, dealing with these activities from the start of the police investigation until the submission of the proposal to institute criminal charges to the relevant Public Prosecutor’s Office; the department also follows the course of the criminal proceedings.  The Financial Police is funded from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia i.e. from the budget line for the Ministry of Finance in amount of 7.191.000 MKD for 2005. These funds will be used for additional employments, equipment for the Financial Police and training for the Financial Police Officers. 
Horizontal Cooperation  
The Public Prosecutors’ Offices cooperates with the other law enforcement agencies in performing its basis prosecuting function. It also cooperates with the courts, other state administrative bodies and legal entities.  Under international treaties, the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia cooperates with the Public Prosecutor’s Offices of other countries, especially in terms of preventing and prosecuting organised crime and other severe forms of crime, through exchange of data, direct cooperation, training, specialisation of personnel and other forms of cooperation.  On the basis of the Law, the Public Prosecutors give instructions to the authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior and other relevant state administrative bodies in undertaking measures in order to detect the perpetrators of the crime, to prevent hiding or absconding of the perpetrators and accomplices, to detect and secure the traces of the crime and the objects that can serve as evidence. The Public Prosecutor is furthermore authorised by law to request from the Ministry of the Interior and other relevant state administrative bodies, other responsible bodies and legal entities to gather all information and undertake other measures aimed at detection of crimes and other punishable offences and their perpetrators. The Public Prosecutor is also authorised to request from the Ministry of the Interior to make available for examination the documents and other evidence collected by the Police while detecting the crime and other punishable offences and their perpetrators.  The Ministry of the Interior and other state administrative bodies, legal and other entities, are obliged to undertake the necessary measures in the shortest possible period and forward to the Public Prosecutor the requested data, reports and documents. In case the state administrative bodies and other entities do not forward the request information, data and documents to the responsible Public Prosecutor, the Public Prosecutor shall inform the Minister of the Interior or other responsible persons at the state administrative bodies that the Public Prosecutor has requested information from, and may propose undertaking relevant measures set forth by the law.  For purposes of prosecuting organised crime and corruption, and other crimes for which a minimum prison sentence of four years is prescribed, and when this is required by the specific circumstances, the Public Prosecutor may request from the relevant state administrative bodies one or more authorised officials to be at his/her disposal for a certain period of time, both in the pre-trial and in the criminal proceedings instituted upon the Public Prosecutor’s proposal. The official head of the relevant administrative body, in this case the Ministry of the Interior, is obliged immediately to accept the request of the Public Prosecutor and detach, for a certain period of time, the requested official to work for the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The detached officials follow the orders and instructions of the Public Prosecutor and are directly accountable for the performance of tasks before the Public Prosecutor.  The provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97 and 44/02 and 74/04) prescribe the obligation of all state administrative bodies and institutions performing public mandate to report crimes that are prosecuted ex officio, about which they have been informed or found out in another manner. When reporting the crime they are also obliged to state the evidence that they are aware of, and to undertake measures to secure the traces of the crime, the objects against which or with which the crime was committed, as well as other evidence.  If the proposal for institution of criminal charges has been submitted to the court, to the Ministry of the Interior or to a Public Prosecutor with a jurisdiction over a different area, they shall accept the proposal and immediately forward it to the competent Public Prosecutor.  The Ministry of the Interior has powers and duties in relation to detection and prosecution of criminal perpetrators in accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure. Namely, if there are reasonable grounds for suspicion that an ex officio prosecuted crime has been committed, the Ministry of the Interior is obliged to undertake the necessary measures to prevent the absconding or hiding of the perpetrators or accomplices, to detect or secure the traces of the crime and the objects that can serve as evidence, and to collect all information that would be of use in the successful processing of the case in criminal proceedings. Upon the gathered information, the Ministry of the Interior establishes the criminal charges in which the available evidence is also stated. The Ministry of the Interior also informs the Public Prosecutor in cases where collected evidence presents no ground to institute criminal charges.  If the Public Prosecutor cannot assess from the charge whether its findings are credible, or the evidence stated in the charge does not present sufficient ground to decide whether to proceed with investigation, or if the public prosecutor has only heard of the committed crime, especially if the perpetrator is unknown, if the Public Prosecutor cannot process the case alone or through other bodies, he/she will request from the Ministry of the the Interior to collect necessary data and undertake other measures to detect the crime and its perpetrator The Public Prosecutor may require needed data and information from the state agencies, institutions which perform public mandate and other legal entities, from the local self-government units and from citizens; the Public Prosecutor may furthermore request to be provided with documents, official notes, files, objects and information; he/she may contact and ask for expert opinion necessary to decide upon the criminal charges.  In connection with the horizontal cooperation among the Ministry of the Interior the Customs Administration and the Financial Police - bodies within the Ministry of Finance see next question. Within the Ministry of the Interior a coordinative body comprised of all agencies involved in combating organised crime and corruption has been established (see 24_I_2)  
Laws incumbent on the police and the performance of police functions:  

  Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04);   Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02);   Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/90, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04);    Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/1997, 44/2002 and 74/2004);   Law on Misdemeanours (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/97);   Law on Misdemeanours against Public Order and Peace (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/72, 29/83, 51/88, 19/90 and 26/93);   Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, Nos. 52/56, 10/65, 4/77, 11/78 and 9/86; and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 44/02);    Law on Administrative Disputes (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 4/77 and 44/02);   Law on Public Gatherings (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/95);   Law on Securing Persons and Property (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 80/1999);   Law on Classified Information (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/2004);   Law on the Personal Identification Number (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/92);   Law on Personal Data Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 07/95);   Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/03);   Law on the Citizenship of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 67/92, 8/04, 45/04);    Law on Movement and Residence of Aliens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 26/93 and 45/02);    Law on Weapons (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05);    Law on Road Traffic Safety (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 14/98, 38/02 and 38/04);    Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Borderzone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 12/93, 11/94 and 19/04);    Law on Travel Documents of the Citizens of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 67/92, 20/03 and 46/04);    Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/2002); and other laws.  The following by-laws further regulate the performance of police duties:    Decree on the Use of Means of Coercion and Firearms (““Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,” Nos. 22/98 and 17/04);    Rulebook on Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior ( “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/98 and 15/03);   Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 3/04);    Rulebook on the Mode of Storing and Protecting Documents, Reports, Data and other acts of the Ministry of the Interior which by Virtue of Law, other Regulations or a Decision by a Competent Body are Designated as State, Military or Business Secret (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 48/95 and 34/03);    Rulebook on the Performance of Duties of the State Security and Counterintelligence Directorate (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/98);    Rulebook on the Performance of Duties of the Internal Control and Professional Standards Sector at the Ministry of the Interior;    Rules for Conduct and Mutual Relations between Employees with Special Tasks and Authorities at the Ministry of the Interior;   Rules on the Treatment of Temporarily Impounded and Found Objects by Authorised Officials of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 56/1995);   Rulebook on the Control of State Border Crossing, Movement and Stay at Border Crossing Points and Records Keeping (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/92);   Decision Designating Protected Persons and Facilities (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 88/02).  In addition to the abovementioned regulations, for purposes of improving the efficiency and successful performance of police duties, the Ministry of the Interior adopts other by-laws, as well rulebooks, instructions, etc.  Within the general administrative functions of the Ministry, the Ministry is also applying the following laws:   Law on the Personal Name (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 8/95);   Law on Personal Identification card (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/95, 38/02 and 16/04);   Law on Personal Citizens Identification Number (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, 36/92);   Law on Registers (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/95 and 38/02);   Law on Registering the Residence and the Dwelling of Citizens (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 12/93 and 43/00);   Law on Registers of Births, Marriages and Deaths (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/95 and 38/02); 
3. Are all police authorities in the country under the same command? Do the powers of individual police authorities overlap? Please describe the procedures for co-operation and co-ordination between the different bodies involved. 
The Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04) explicitly determines that internal affairs refer to: protection of life, personal safety and  the property of the citizens; crime prevention, detecting and apprehension of crime perpetrators and their hand over to the competent bodies; protection of human rights and freedoms guaranteed by the Constitution; prevention of forceful destruction of democratic institutions established by the Constitution; maintenance of public order and peace; prevention of inflammation of national, racial and religious hatred and intolerance; security of certain persons and facilities; regulation and  control of traffic on roads and other affairs related to traffic security on the roads; stay and movement of aliens and other matters stipulated by law.  The authorised officers from the Ministry of the Interior, for the performance of their duties and assignments are accountable to their immediate superior and according to the system of subordination - accountable to the superior of the organisational form at the higher level which covers the area in which the relevant officer is working.  All the organisational forms responsible for internal affairs are systematised within the Department for Police, the Department for Organised Crime and the Department for Border Police, as well as in several autonomous organisational forms that perform activities for the needs of the Department for Police and the Department for Organised Crime. All these organisational forms are part of the Bureau for Public Security. The Bureau is managed by a Director. Heads of the Department for Police, of the Department for Organised Crime and of the Border Police Department are undersecretaries who are functionally connected with the Director of the Bureau for Public Security, and they are accountable directly to the Director for the duties and assignments from their field of work, respectively. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon a nomination by the Minister of the Interior, appoints and dismisses the Director of the Bureau for Public Security. The Director is accountable for his performance to the Minister and to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  The territory of the Republic of Macedonia is covered by 12 regional organisational forms – Sectors for Internal Affairs, managed by Heads of Sectors. 23 Sections for Internal Affairs have been established within these sectors. For direct police work, police stations have been established for the area of one or more municipalities. These police stations are managed by police commanders.    The Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence is a body within the Ministry, managed by a Director, appointed and dismissed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon a nomination by the Minister of the Interior. The State Secretary of the Ministry unites the operations and promotes horizontal coordination of all the organisational forms within the Ministry. He/she is appointed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon a nomination by the Minister.   At the top of the hierarchical structure of the Ministry is the Minister of the Interior, who is appointed and dismissed, upon a nomination by the President of the Government, by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the provisions of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, a body of state administration in the field of Police must be headed by a person, who has been a civilian for at least three years before his/her appointment. The Minister is accountable for his/her work to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. The provisions of the Rulebook on Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior clearly and precisely regulate the competences, authorisations and responsibilities of all police and other bodies within the Ministry. Namely, the operations of the public security system are carried out by the Bureau of Public Security, and the Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence is in charge of the state security, while all the organisational forms within these two bodies have their respective, clearly and precisely determined, competencies. In view of this, all police services within the Ministry of the Interior have their own tasks and responsibilities, which clearly points to the fact that authorities do not overlap in the police services.  The Ministry of the Interior and other state administrative bodies cooperate on a daily basis. The distinctions of the scope of work and authorities of these institutions are defined by the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, and further developed with sectoral laws and by-laws.  The Law on Internal Affairs prescribes that the citizens, enterprises and other legal entities and administrative bodies should facilitate the Ministry of the Interior to perform its duties in an orderly manner. At the same time, it is prescribed that the Ministry, within its competence, should extend professional assistance to citizens, enterprises and other legal persons and administrative bodies in the  exercise of the established rights and obligations, in the protection of life, personal safety of the citizens and their property. The Law also prescribes that the Ministry of the Interior should provide the citizens, enterprises and other legal persons, and state bodies with information, data and reports for which they are directly concerned, from within the scope of operation of the Ministry.  The provisions of the Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, 9/86 – consolidated text, “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/02) regulate the cooperation i.e. providing legal assistance between the state administrative bodies. Pursuant to this Law, the administrative bodies that have public authority to make decisions on administrative issues have the duty to provide to each other legal assistance in the administrative procedure. The bodies for internal affairs have the duty to provide to the body competent for enforcement of the execution, upon its request, assistance in the enforcement of the execution.    According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), which regulates the organisation, competencies and the operation of the state administrative bodies, the state administrative bodies performing inspection tasks have the duty in performing inspection matters of common interest to cooperate between themselves, as well as with other administrative bodies. In case of a dispute over competence between the ministries, or other controversial issues related to their responsibilities, these ministries are obliged to establish an inter-ministerial group to solve the disputable issues. If an agreement can not be reached, the ministries must inform the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The Government shall review the disputable issue and give appropriate instructions to the ministries.   On 10.11.2003, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the document Specific Action Oriented Measures against Organised Crime, supported by the Council of the European Union on 28.11.2003. The Document, inter alia, establishes measures pertaining for efficient inter-institutional cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance. In that view, a Memorandum for Cooperation in Organised Crime Prevention in the Republic of Macedonia was signed by the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance in November 2004. This Memorandum, reiterating the mutual efforts and interest for promotion of the cooperation and coordination in the prevention and fight against organised crime in the Republic of Macedonia establishes that the cooperation between the two Ministries would be performed through direct activities between the organisational unit of the Ministry of the Interior responsible for prevention of organised crime, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, the Customs Administration and the Financial Police within the Ministry of Finance. The frame for the cooperation is their competencies prescribed by law. The Memorandum includes available means of cooperation: mutual information exchange; establishing mutual priorities; coordination of the activities; creation of common multidisciplinary teams to act in revealing specific cases; undertaking joint actions; creation and development of common standards, particularly regarding information gathering and their processing and development of compatible IT systems and software; and joint activities of permanent training of personnel. The Memorandum will be subject of continual joint analysis. The document also provides for drafting Protocols, which would be additionally concluded between the Ministry of the Interior – Criminal Police Department and the Directorate for Money Laundering Prevention, the Customs Administration and the Financial Police.    The identified need for explicit definition of issues and procedures for cooperation between the various bodies, implicates initiation of procedures for drafting other Memoranda for cooperation in specific areas, between bodies of the state administration. 
4. Which administrative and/or judicial control bodies and procedures exist? How is (a) internal and (b) judicial oversight organised and enforced? 

Control by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia  The control over the Ministry of the Interior is exercised by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, while the judicial control is exercised by the competent courts.  The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia exercises supervision over the operation of the Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence. Pursuant to the provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04) the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia supervises the operation of the Directorate for State Security and Counter-intelligence, through the respective committee. The terms of reference and the composition of the Committee for Supervision over the Operation of the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence are defined by the Decision on Establishment of Permanent Working Bodies of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 85/02 and 30/03).    According to the aforementioned Decision, the Committee reviews the issues pertaining to:   Respect of the constitutionl and legal rights and liberties, by the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence;   Legality in the exercise of authority on the part of the Security and Counter-Intelligence Directorate and the Intelligence Agency in terms of possible exceeding of authority, unauthorised activities, abuse and other detrimental actions, in violation of their rights determined by Law;   Methods and means applied by the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence in terms of legality and respect for the rights of the citizens and other entities;   Financial, human resources and technical capacity of the Directorate for State Security and Counter-Intelligence and the Intelligence Agency, and other issues regarding the Directorate for State Security and Counter-Intelligence and the Intelligence Agency.  The Committee, pursuant to the provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs, submits a report on the performed activities at least once a year. Before submitting the report to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia the Committee submit the report to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, for an opinion. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia has to deliver the opinion within 30 days from the date when the report is received. The legal basis for availability of data to the Committee is provided in the Law on Internal Affairs, which stipulates an explicit obligation for the Director of the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence to ensure access and to provide to the Committee all reports and data from within the Directorate’s scope of work. The reports and data presented at the session of the Committee are considered a state secret. The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia communicates the conclusions on the Committee’s report to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  Furthermore, the control of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia over the operation of the Ministry of the Interior is also exercised by parliamentary questions (for more details see I_B_02) and through a motion for interpelation of at least five Representatives of the Assembly regarding the work of a public official elected or appointed by the Assembly, the Government or any of its individual members, as well as regarding issues related to operation of the state bodies. Control by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia   According to the provisions of the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02), the supervision over the operation of the ministries is exercised by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (for details see I_C_10). The supervision over the operation of the Ministries enforced by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia comprises the supervision over the legality and efficiency of their operation.  Internal Control The internal control within the Ministry of the Interior is carried out by the Sector  for Internal Control and Professional Standards, which as a separate organisational unit directly works on clearing up and documenting of exceeding of the legal powers, abuses of official duty or other illegal acts perpetrated by the employees in the Ministry of the Interior. At the same time, the abovementioned organisational unit, pursuant to the established scope of work, proposes also adequate measures for suppression and resolving of the identified phenomena of abuse of official powers by the officers of the Ministry of the Interior. Pursuant to the provisions from the Rulebook on Mode of Operation of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards of the Ministry of the Interior (strictly confidential No. 15.1-7716/1 of 29.09.2003), Decision on Abolishing the Type and Degree of Secrecy No. 161/5294/1 of 03.02.2004 and the Rulebook Amending the Rulebook on Mode of Operation of the of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards of the Ministry of the Interior No.161-38562 of 12.07.2004, the detection and documenting of the unlawful and unprofessional conduct of the employees in the Ministry is performed on the basis of data, information and findings that, upon their own motion or upon a request, are presented and submitted by the officers in the Ministry, on the basis of petitions by citizens, and upon an order of the Minister of the Interior. When the needs so require, and on the basis of an approval by the Minister, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards can subject the employees in the Ministry of the Interior to medical and other examinations directed at detecting the presence of alcohol or narcotic substances in their organisms. The inspectors of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, as well as the inspectors of the Sector who are detached to the regional organisational units of the Ministry have the duty to act and to examine the allegations presented in the petitions submitted by citizens, related to unlawful and unprofessional conduct of the employees in the Ministry. The submitted petitions are recorded in the Register of Petitions. The Sector informs in writing the employee that there is a petition submitted against him/her, and informs him/her about the reasons the petition was submitted. But, as an exception, the Sector can place the officer under surveillance for a given period of time, before informing him/her about the petition, in order to establish whether the allegations for the petition are well-founded. Investigations on the less severe forms of unlawful and unprofessional conduct should be completed not later than 30 days from the submission of the petition, and those on severe unlawful and unprofessional conduct within 90 days. As an exception, and approved by the head of the Sector if there are justified reasons for it, the investigation can be extended over a longer period of time, but not longer than 6 months. In cases when the investigation lasts longer than 30 days from the date of submission of the petition, the petitioner will be informed within 30 days from the submission of the petition that the investigation continues in order to ascertain additional facts.   If in the course of the investigation it is established that there are grounds to instigate a dismissal procedure on the basis of violation of the working discipline, the Sector will propose that the investigation continues before the Dismissal Committee, pursuant to the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. The head of the organisational unit or the inspector of the Sector prepares a final report about the investigation and the results from it, which is forwarded to the head of the Sector. After its reviewing and approval by the head of the Sector, the final report is submitted to the Minister.      The Inspector of the Sector, who has prepared the final report on the undertaken investigation, will inform in writing the concerned officer, the head of the organisational unit where that officer is employed, the submitter of the petition (unless he/she is anonymous), and the Minister, about the result of the investigation.   The investigations upon petitions related to violation of human rights by an officer of the Ministry, corruption, extensive use of force and firearms and other more severe cases of unlawful and unprofessional conduct, are carried out exclusively by the inspectors of the Sector. In the course of the investigations, the inspectors use the prescribed operational and operative-technical means and methods. After the completion of the investigation, a final report is composed which, inter alia, contains one of the following conclusions: results from the investigation corroborate the suspicion that the officer against whom the investigation was carried out was acting unlawfully or unprofessionally;  there is insufficient evidence to either corroborate or rule out the suspicion of unlawful or unprofessional action; the suspicion was unfounded. Also, there is a possibility that the results of the investigation show that the officer had acted unlawfully or unprofessionally but there were circumstances relieving them of liability. The Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards can open an investigation also on the basis of data, information and findings that are presented by the officers of the Ministry, upon their own motion or upon a request, related to unlawful or unprofessional conduct of an officer in the Ministry. Also, every head of an organisational unit within the Ministry can request that an investigation is opened.       If in the course of the investigation it is established that the unlawful conduct of the officer of the Ministry of the Interior contains elements of a criminal offence, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards has the obligation to directly inform the public prosecutor and to simultaneously inform the Department for Criminal Police. Besides the aforementioned modes, the internal control is also performed through opening and carrying out of a procedure to establish violations of the working discipline, which is legally regulated by the provisions of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/98, 11/98, 12/00, 3/03 and 3/04) When a case of violation of the working discipline was established, or a case of non-performance of the obligations prescribed by the law, by the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior or by the employment contract, the undersecretaries in the Ministry, the director of the Directorate and the officers authorised by the Minister submit a proposal to instigate a procedure to establish the responsibility of the officer. The proposal, pursuant to Article 143 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, is delivered to the officer and he/she is requested to submit a written statement regarding the allegations contained in the proposal. The proposal is also delivered to the Trade Union. The procedure is carried out by a Dismissal Committee, which is established by a Decision of the Minister of the Interior, and which is composed by a chairperson, two members and their deputies. However, in cases of violations of the working discipline or non-fulfilment of the obligations from Article 133 paragraph 1 items 3, 18, 19 and 20 of the Collective Agreement (if the employee is unjustifiably absent from work during three consecutive working days or five working days within a year; does not adhere to the schedule of working hours; does not ask for a leave in time; or does not inform the Minister or the head of the organisational unit or another responsible officer about the absence from work; due to illness or justified reasons is absent from work, but does not inform the Minister or the manager of the organisational unit or another responsible officer within 24 hours), as well as in the cases when the officer, upon a criminal complaint, is sentenced to a measure of detention, the proposal to instigate a proposal to establish the responsibility of the officer is submitted directly to the Minister to bring a decision without procedure before the Dismissal Committee. Until the enactment of a final decision for termination of employment by dismissal, the officer can be suspended from the post and from the Ministry in the cases established by the Labour Relations Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 14/95, 53/97, 21/98, 25/00, 3/01, 50/01, 25/03, and 40/03) and in cases of severe violation of the working discipline, if one of the following situations occur:    The life or the health of the officers or other persons are directly threatened; or assets of greater value are damaged;   The presence at the job post and further work in the Ministry will have a detrimental impact on the operation of the Ministry;   It impedes or makes impossible the establishing of responsibility for violation of the working obligations;   When a criminal procedure is instigated against that person for a criminal offence perpetrated in the course of work or in relation to the work. The Dismissal Committee has the duty to urgently review the proposal and to set a hearing to which the officer against whom the procedure is instigated and the representative of the Trade Union of the basic organisational unit where the officer is a member are summoned. After the hearing, the committee establishes the responsibility of the officer and prepares a written proposal to the Minister to enact an appropriate decision. If the committee establishes that the officer is not responsible or that the conditions to enact a decision for termination of employment by a dismissal are not fulfilled, it proposes to the Minister to reject the proposal and to terminate the procedure. The decision for termination of employment by dismissal is enacted by the Minister of the Interior. Depending on the degree of responsibility of the officer, the conditions under which the violation of the working obligations was perpetrated, the previous work and conduct of the employee, severity of the violation and its consequences, the Minister can replace the dismissal with a fine which can not be higher than 15% of the monthly salary of the employee, in duration between 1 and 6 months. The officer has the right to file an appeal against the decision of the Minister of the Interior to the competent committee within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. After the second instance ruling, the employee has a right to submit a complaint before a competence court, within a legally prescribed timeframe (for more details see I_F_11). Judicial Control   Pursuant to Article 142 paragraph 9 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/00 and 74/04) the person against whom actions are undertaken by the Ministry of the Interior can within 30 days from the date of undertaking the actions, request, from an investigative judge to examine their legality and the potential violation of rights, and the competent court has the duty to establish this by a ruling. The Ruling is delivered to the requesting party, to the Ministry of the Interior and to the competent public prosecutor. Pursuant to Article 22 paragraph (6) of this Law, an appeal is permitted against this ruling. The appeal should be submitted within 48 hours to the criminal council composed of three professional judges. The Chamber has the duty to act upon the appeal within three days.   Besides the aforementioned rights, pursuant to Article 530 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the person who was, due to mistake or unlawful operation of the body, unfoundedly or unlawfully deprived of liberty, enjoys the right of compensation of damage. Under Article 530 of the Law on Criminal Procedure the person also enjoys the right of compensation of damage in the person:   Was in detention, and no criminal procedure was instigated or the procedure was terminated by a final ruling, or the person was by a final ruling acquitted from the charges, or the charges were rejected;   Served a sentence deprival of liberty, and on the occasion of the reopening of the criminal procedure, or the request for protection of legality, or the request for extraordinary review of the final court judgement, a measure of deprival of liberty in duration shorter than the sentence which the person had already served was pronounced, or a criminal sanction which does not consist of deprival of liberty was pronounced, or the person was found guilty, but relieved of the sanction;   Has spent in detention a longer period of time than the duration of the pronounced sentence. Pursuant to Article 526 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the right of compensation of demage is enjoyed also by the person against whom by a final decision a criminal sanction was pronounced, or a person who was found guilty but released from punishment and afterwards due to an extraordinary legal remedy the new procedure was terminated with a final judgement, or was by a final decision acquitted of the charges, or the charges were rejected, except in the following cases:   If the procedure was terminated or the charges were rejected, due to the fact that in the new procedure the damaged as a plaintiff i.e. the private prosecutor has withdrawn from the prosecution or the damaged has withdrawn from the proposal and the withdrawal has been a consequence of the agreement with the accused;   If by a decision in the new procedure the indictment was rejected due to incompetence of the court and the authorised prosecutor has initiated the prosecution before the competent court.  A person enforces the right of compensation of damage through submission of a request to the Ministry of Justice to reach a settlement regarding the existence of damage, the type and the amount of compensation. If the request for compensation of damage is not accepted, or the Ministry of Justice does not reach a decision within three months from the date of submission of the request, the damaged may bring a charge for compensation of damage at the competent court. The charge is submitted against the Republic of Macedonia.  The judicial control over the work of the police is enforced also within a civil procedure instigated upon a lodged complaint for compensation of damage having occurred as a consequence of the unlawful conduct of the police. According to the provisions of the Law on Obligations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.18/01) the damage is defined as reduction of one’s property and prevention of its growth (material damage), as well as inflicting other physical or emotional pain or fear (non-material damage). The material damage is compensated by re-establishing the situation existing before the damage occurred, and if that is not possible, the court can decide that the damaged person is paid an appropriate amount of money on the grounds of compensation of the damage. For suffered emotional pain due to reduction of the life activity, mutilation, defamation of character, damage to honour, to freedoms or rights of the person, for death of a close relative, for fear, and for suffered physical pain the court, if it finds that the circumstances of the case, and especially the severity of the pain and the fear and their duration so justify, will award a fair financial compensation on the grounds of non-material damage, irrespectively of the material damage, and also in the absence of it. 5. What powers do the police have: a) In terms of preventing potential threats? b) In terms of criminal investigation? 
a) Pursuant to Article 1 of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/03, 33/03 and 19/04), the Ministry of the Interior undertakes measures and actions related to the:    Protection of the life, personal security and property of citizens;   Prevention of crimes, detection and apprehension of perpetrators of crimes and their handing over to competent bodies;    Protection of human rights and freedoms guaranteed by the Constitution;    Prevention of violent overthrow of the democratic institutions established under the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia;    Maintenance of the public order and peace;    Prevention of incitement of national, racial, or religious hatred or intolerance;    Securing certain persons and facilities;    Regulating and controlling road traffic and performing other activities related to road traffic safety;    Protection of the state border, controlling state border crossing and stay in the borderland;    Stay and movement of aliens;    Establishing and resolving border incidents and other violations of the state border;    Setting, control, and maintenance of marks demarcating the border line at land and water;    Control of the conditions for manufacture, trade, procurement, possession and carrying of arms, spare parts for arms and ammunition;   Control of the manufacture, trade, storage, transport and protection from explosive and other hazardous materials and storage and protection of inflammable liquids and gases;    Control of the registering and cancellation of the place of sojourn and residence of citizens;    Assisting in eliminating the consequences caused by natural disasters and epidemics that could threaten the life and health of citizens and the property;    Research and development within the scope of the ministry’s competencies;    Other activities determined by the law.  The activities related to maintenance of the public peace and order, regulation and control of the road traffic, safety at lakes, and other activities referred to in Article 1 of the Law on Internal Affairs, the nature or circumstances of which require engagement of uniformed officers of the Ministry, are performed by the police.  The activities related to the securing of the state border, control of state border crossing, establishment and resolution of border incidents and other violations of the state border and other activities set forth in the laws are performed by the Border Police.  The Criminal Police performs activities related to prevention of crimes, detection and apprehension of perpetrators of crimes, forensics related activities, control of the stay and movement of aliens, and inspection surveillance in the field of protection from fire and explosions. The Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence deals with the activities related to protection from espionage and terrorism, or to other activities aimed at threatening or overthrowing the democratic institutions established under the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia by use of violence, as well as activities related to protection from serious forms of organised crime.  In accordance with the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) which are further elaborated in the Rulebook on Manner of Operation by the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/1998, 137/98, 10/99, 91/01, 1/02 and 15/03), in the performance of duties under the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior, authorised officials undertake prescribed activities and measures in cases foreseen in the law or other regulations, such as:    Request ID documents in order to verify the identity of persons;    Warn citizens if there is a reasonable suspicion that, by their conducts, they could threaten or violate the public peace and order or threaten the life and property of another person or when it could be reasonably expected that the citizens would cause another person to perpetrate a crime or a misdemeanour;    Summon citizens for purposes of gathering necessary information in connection with committed crimes or for gathering information that could be of use for successful processing of the case in criminal proceedings;   Issue orders to citizens and other legal entities and bodies when this is required to protect the life and personal safety of people and of the property; to prevent the perpetration of a crime which is prosecuted ex officio or a misdemeanour; to secure the traces of a crime and objects that could serve as evidence in criminal or misdemeanour proceedings and; to maintain or prevent the violation of the public peace and order and to restore the public peace and order in other cases;    Gather necessary information from citizens;    Perform searches of vehicles, persons and luggage;    Limit the movement in a given area and facility (blockade, raid and ambush);   Enter the home and premises upon presenting identification documents and a court decision i.e. Order;    Secure and examine the crime scene;    Secure and examine places of major traffic accidents, railway and airplane accidents or of natural disasters;    Inspect the business books and other documentation of state authorities, institutions with public competences or other legal entities;    Search for persons and objects for purposes of detecting and apprehending perpetrators of crimes, finding objects that are related to the crime, establishing the identity of apprehended unknown persons, establishing the identity of a found and unidentified corpse, and gathering information on persons and objects;    If necessary, stop and pursue a suspicious vessel, check the flag, check the vessel’s logs, search the vessel and escort the vessel to a relevant body if the vessel does not abide by regulations;    Provide assistance upon reasoned request by relevant body for execution of a court order in accordance with the conditions laid down in law.  Authorised officials may use means of coercion prescribed in the Decree on Use of Means of Coercion and Fire Arms (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 22/98 and 17/04) to restore the violated public peace and order of large scale; overcome the resistance of a person that violates the public peace and order, or a person to be apprehended, detained or deprived of liberty; to counter an attack against themselves, another person or a facility which is secured and; to forcibly remove a person from a given area, or a person who does not follow the orders of an authorised official.  If it is possible the authorised officials shall use those types of coercion that in a given situation shall not cause damage or shall cause minimal damage.  Authorised officials that used means of coercion or firearms shall submit a written report to their superior official who shall asses the grounds, justification and the regularity of use of the means of coercion, i.e. fire arms.  The Report shall contain the data regarding time, place and manner of applying the means of coercion or firearms, the person against whom the means have been applied, the eventual consequences from the use of such means and, the personal name of the authorised official who has used means of coercion i.e. fire arms.  In case when the use of means of coercion or fire arms has caused serious bodily injury or death of a person or when the means of coercion have been used against several persons, the organisational unit in charge of internal control at the Ministry of the Interior shall consider the circumstances under which such means or firearms have been used, and shall prepare a report assessing the grounds, justification and correctness of the use of means of coercion, or fire arms.  The Report on the use of means of coercion in circumstances of disturbed public peace and order of large scale is submitted to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia.  However, after the adoption of the Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/04), and of the Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04), in addition to the Ministry of the Interior, the financial police is also involved in prevention of possible crimes, and in the conduct of criminal investigations, in cases and in a manner prescribed by law.  In accordance with the provisions contained in the Law on Financial Police, the Financial Police is a state administration body within the Ministry of Finance.  The scope of competencies of the Financial Police as set forth in the Law on Financial Police encompasses the following:    Control of the correct application of tax and customs regulations;    Gathering information and data, in cooperation and in coordination with other sectors of the Ministry of Finance, Ministry of the Interior, Public Prosecutor’s Office and other state authorities and legal entities in order to detect persons violating the law, i.e. persons involved in activities related to tax evasion, money laundering, smuggling, illegal trade in goods and products, or other types of crimes, which involve large and significant amounts of tax, customs and other revenues;   Investigations against one or several persons that are reasonably suspected of being involved in unlawful financial activities contrary to the economic interest of the country overall or against the interest of certain economic branches, organised in the country or of international nature and are within the competencies of the Ministry of Finance;    Investigations of natural or legal persons involved in activities, which are in collision with the applicable regulations against money laundering, tax evasion, or other types of financial crime;    Investigations of financial crime that cannot be proven directly based on the existing evidence and require application of methods of circumstantial evidence, such as for example: expenditures, assessment of the value or existence of bank accounts, etc, used in cases when part or the entire financial documents of the tax payer do not exist or have been destroyed or are unavailable owing to other reasons;   Investigations in cases when there are reasonable grounds to believe that a suspicious contract has been concluded;    Introducing database about potentially risky taxpayers, i.e. persons who have already been convicted of serious crimes, or who due to other reasons are considered as a risk in order to protect the staff in the service from physical attacks i.e. bodily injury;   Expert computer analysis of seized evidence in form of computer data, from mobile telephones or other electronic devices and outlets that contain information of interest for the suppression of financial crime.  In the performance of its duties, the Financial Police is authorised to:    Inspect and research business books, other documents, records, minutes, memoranda, computer data and data on electronic outlets which contain information and elements of tax returns of persons under investigation;   Take statements from the suspects and witnesses about business books, minutes and other documents in order to gather the necessary information and evidence;   Provide samples of handwriting for authentication and proof the origin of documents;   Search business premises of the suspect and other premises, based on the assessment of the financial police or upon request of the Public Prosecutor’s Office;    Search the home of the person (apartment, house, cottage and alike) based on a court warrant;   Apprehend persons under investigations or who obstruct or impede the investigation or proceedings;    Temporarily stop and search vehicles that are reasonably suspected of being used in transport of goods and people, search warehouses, and other storage facilities regardless of who is the owner of the facilities;   Confiscate traded/transported goods, when there is no evidence that the fees have been paid or in lack of documents on the origin of the goods;   Temporarily impound the vehicle or other means of transport used for carriage of goods, if the value of the goods is higher that one third of the value of the means of transport used for their carriage;   Temporarily impound money, securities, objects and documents from the start of the investigation until the completion of the proceedings;   Seize electronic, mechanical or other devices that possibly contain data, logs, and other documents or other type of information considered to be potential evidence; and    Submit a request to the court for temporary measure of prohibition of disposal with property, equipment and assets on account from the start of the investigation until the completion of the proceedings.  The staff at the Financial Police (financial police officers) posses fire arms that they may carry and use in the performance of their official duties in the following circumstances:    To counter a direct attack against themselves threatening their property; and    To prevent the absconding in a means of transportation.  Prior to using the fire arms, the financial police officers are obliged to warn the person against whom they intend to use the fire arms.  
b)  In accordance with Article 142 of the Law on Criminal Procedure, (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), when there are reasonable grounds for suspicion that an ex officio prosecuted crime has been committed, the Ministry of the Interior has the duty to undertake the required measures to detect the perpetrator of the crime, to prevent the absconding or hiding of the perpetrator or accomplice/accomplices, to detect and secure the traces of the crime and objects that could serve as evidence, and to gather all information that could be of use in successful processing of the case in the criminal proceedings.  For purposes of performing the abovementioned duties, authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may undertake the following measures and actions:    Request necessary information from citizens;   Stop, check the identity and inspect or search persons, vehicles, luggage if there are reasonable suspicions that traces of the crime can be found or objects that could serve as evidence. The ministry of the interior may use reasonable means of force only as last resort and if required for the performance of the inspection, or search of the person, vehicle or luggage;    Issue an order redirecting, directing or, limiting the movement of persons and vehicles in a given area for a certain period of time;   Undertake necessary measures to establish the identity of persons and of objects;    Undertake investigation, issue a wanted circular and notice regarding the property and material proceeds or objects that are searched for;    In the presence of an official or responsible person, search certain premises and buildings of state administration bodies, institutions having public mandate and other legal entities and inspect their documentation.  The authorised officials have duty to take minutes about the facts and circumstances established in the course of a given action, which could be of interest for the criminal proceedings and about objects found or impounded.  Persons and passengers in vehicles under search or inspection are to be informed that minutes shall be prepared about the performed actions.  The period for which the person or vehicle may be kept for purposes of performance of activities by the Ministry of the Interior must be reduced to the shortest necessary timefor the performance of such activities.  The Ministry may issue written summons to citizens for purposes of gathering necessary information. The summons must contain an explanation of the reasons for summoning and advice on their rights.  The summoned person may be brought with use of force only when this is based on a court decision and only when it is obvious that the person avoids to report upon dully forwarded summons, in which the person has been warned of the possibility to be brought to the police by use of force and when the person shall not offer justification for not responding to the summons. The person that has reported to the police based on a summons, or a person brought by use of means of force, who refuses to give information, may not be summoned again on the same grounds.  Persons summoned or brought by use of force must be informed in a language they understand of the reasons for the summoning, i.e. apprehension, of their rights and must not be forced to give a statement. Furthermore, they must be advised that they are not deprived of their liberty and after giving or after refusing to give information, they may leave.  Based on a warrant of an investigative judge, i.e. the President of the Court Chamber, authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may gather information from persons in detention, if this is necessary for detection of other crimes committed by the same person or the accomplices or of crimes committed by other perpetrators. The information shall be gathered within a period determined by the investigative judge and in his/her presence or in the presence of a person appointed by the investigative judge i.e. by the President of the Court Council.  Furthermore, authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may bring before the investigative judge persons found on the crime scene or keep them in custody until the judge comes, but not longer than 6 hours, if the persons could provide information of importance for the criminal proceedings, or if it is probable that they could not be heard at a later stage, or if this would imply significant delays or other difficulties.  In accordance with the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, authorised officers of the Ministry of the Interior may take photographs and take fingerprints from persons who are reasonably suspected of having committed a crime, and when this is required for establishing of the identity, or in other cases of interest for successful processing of the case, and may publish the photographs of the persons, upon a court approval.  Furthermore, authorised officers of the Ministry of the Interior may take fingerprints from persons who are reasonably believed to have been in contact with objects i.e. when it is necessary to establish to whom the fingerprints found on the objects belong.  In addition to the abovementioned measures and activities, when there is a threat of delay, prior to institution of the investigation, authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may temporarily impound objects which according to the Criminal Code may be impounded or that can serve as evidence in court proceedings and may furthermore search the home and persons under conditions and in a manner laid down by the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure.  If the investigative judge is not able to immediately attend the crime scene, the authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior, may inspect and order forensic examinations, except autopsy and exhumation of corpse. In case the investigative judge comes at the crime scene in the course of the inspection, the judge takes over the inspection. The Public Prosecutor shall be informed of all undertaken actions.  When the perpetrator of the crime is not known, the Public Prosecutor may request the Ministry of the Interior to undertake certain investigative actions, if considering the circumstances in a given case, it would be reasonable to undertake such actions prior to institution of the investigation.  The Public Prosecutor may order one or several authorised persons from the relevant ministry or other state administration authority to be made available for the prosecution for not longer than one year, in the pre-trial or in the criminal proceedings instituted upon the Public Prosecutor’s request when it is a matter of crimes punished with imprisonment of at least four years, crimes perpetrated by several persons, or when there are especially justified reasons.  In accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure the person caught in the perpetration of crime prosecuted  ex officio may be deprived of their liberty by any person (citizen’s arrest), if there is a threat of the person’s absconding. The person deprived of liberty must be immediately taken before an investigative judge or to the Ministry of the Interior and if this is not possible, one of these bodies must be immediately informed.  Authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may deprive of liberty a person who is reasonably suspected of having committed a crime prosecuted ex officio, without a court decision, when there is threat of delay and some of the reasons to determine detention exist (if the person is in hiding, if his/her identity cannot be established or if there are circumstances pointing to the risk of absconding), but are obliged to bring such a person before an investigative judge. In apprehending such persons, the authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior shall inform the investigative judge about the reasons and time of deprivation of liberty, preparing an official note in this respect. If there is no official note, the investigative judge shall enter the information in the minutes.  As an exception, authorised officers of the Ministry of the Interior may keep the person who is reasonably suspected of having committed a crime prosecuted ex officio, if this is required to establish the identity, to check the alibi or if there are other reasons for gathering information necessary for processing the case against a person, and if there are grounds to determine detention (if the person is in hiding, if his/her identity cannot be established or if there are circumstances giving which imply that the person shall repeat the crime, or that he/she would complete the attempted crime or that he/she would commit the crime that he/she threatens with) in cases when the grounds for determining detention is the reasonable fear that the person shall destroy the traces of the crime or when there are special circumstances pointing that the person will interfere with the investigation by influencing the witnesses, accomplices or persons harbouring criminals, only if there is a fear that this person shall destroy the traces of the crime.  Persons deprived of liberty must be immediately informed in a language they understand about the reasons for the deprivation of liberty or of any criminal charges raised against them, as well as about their rights and may not be asked to give a statement.  In the abovementioned cases, if the person deprived of liberty asks assistance from defence lawyer, the authorised official of the Ministry of the Interior shall provide the contact with the defence lawyer, or shall provide a defence lawyer, and shall delay all actions until the defence lawyer is present, but only for a maximum of 2 hours from the time the defence lawyer has been informed. Authorised officials of the Ministry of the Interior may hold the person in police custody for not more than 24 hours from the moment the person has been deprived of liberty. After the 24-hour period, they are obliged to release the person or bring him/her before the competent investigative judge.  Persons are kept in custody in specially designed police stations, determined by a ministerial decree. The reception officer approves the police custody and prepares minutes regarding each apprehended person in which the following information is entered: day and hour of deprivation of liberty, the reasons for the deprivation of liberty, the time the person has been advised of his/her rights, visible signs of injuries, illnesses, mental disorders and similar; when the person contacted with the family, defence lawyer, the diplomatic or consular mission and similar; information when the interview has been conducted, information whether the person has been transferred to another police station, whether the person has been released or brought before court, and other important information. The person deprived of liberty co-signs the minutes in the part related to the hour and date of deprivation of liberty, the hour and date of the release and the advice about the right to have a defence lawyer, and cosigns the minutes in their entirety. The reception officer must explain the lack of signature of the person deprived of liberty. The person deprived of liberty is handed a copy of the minutes upon release to liberty or upon being brought before an investigative judge. In a case, in conformity with the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, where the person is not brought before an investigative judge, and has been transferred to another police station, a copy of the minutes is forwarded to the concerned police station.  If the person deprived of liberty is brought before an investigative judge, in accordance with the provisions set forth in the Law on Criminal Procedure, the investigative judge is obliged ex officio to examine the legality of the deprivation of liberty, being also obliged to establish this in a ruling.  If the person deprived of liberty is not brought before an investigative judge, then within 30 days from the release to liberty, the person has the right to request from the investigative judge of the competent court to examine the legality of the deprivation of liberty and to establishe this in a separate ruling. An appeal may be lodged against such a ruling within 48 hours, to the Chamber of the Basic Court that deliberates a decision within three days. The appeal delays the execution of the ruling.  In accordance with the provisions contained in the Law on Criminal Procedure, based on a court order, authorised officials may search homes and persons.  However, the Law on Criminal Procedure also provides for the possibility that authorised officials perform search of a person, without a search warrant and without presence of witnesses, when fulfilling an order for apprehension or upon depriving a person from liberty in case there are reasonable grounds to suspect that the concerned person possesses weapons or other objects that could be used for attack, or if there are reasonable suspicions that the concerned person would throw away, hide or destroy the objects that are to be impounded from him/her, as evidence in criminal proceedings.  The Ministry of the Interior may apply polygraph testing when there are reasonable suspicions that the person has perpetrated a crime, if the concerned person has given a written consent. Persons under influence of alcohol, narcotics and psychotropic substances, then persons with serious heart conditions, persons who have evident signs of mental disorder or a mental disability, pregnant women, or women immediately after delivery, may not be subjected to polygraph testing.  The Ministry of the Interior may not subject to polygraph test children below the age of 14. Younger and older juveniles may be subject to polygraph testing as an exception if there are reasonable grounds to suspect that they have perpetrated a crime and only based on a written consent of their parent or guardian.  Officials authorised by law at the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia have similar competencies as their counterparts in the Ministry of the Interior in the pre-trail proceedings and in the investigating procedure, in cases of detecting crimes and perpetrators, gathering evidence for purposes of criminal prosecution of perpetrators of crimes of: Production and release for trade of harmful curative products (Article 212 of the Criminal Code); Production and release for trade of harmful food and other products (Article 213 of the Criminal Code); Unauthorised production and release for trade of narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors (Article 215 of the Criminal Code);  Unauthorised procurement and possession of nuclear materials (Article 231 of the Criminal Code);  Bringing hazardous materials into the country (Article 232 of the Criminal Code); Carrying abroad cultural monument, an archive material or a natural rarity (Article 266 of the Criminal Code); Money laundering and other proceeds from crime (Article 273 of the Criminal Code); Smuggling (Article 278 of the Criminal Code); Tax fraud (Article 278-a of the Criminal Code); Withholding goods subject of smuggling and customs frauds (Article 278-b of the Criminal Code); Tax evasion (Article 279 of the Criminal Code); Unlawful keeping weapons and explosive materials (Article 396 of the Criminal Code); Trafficking in human beings (Article 481-a of the Criminal Code), as well as crimes under Article 59 and 60 of the Excise Law and other crimes related to import, export and transit of goods across the border.  The Financial Police has similar competencies as the Ministry of the Interior in the pre-trial proceedings and in the investigative procedures in connection with detecting crimes and their perpetrators and gathering evidence for purposes of criminal prosecution of perpetrators of crimes of: Tax evasion (Article 279 of the Criminal Code); Money laundering and other proceeds from crime (Article 273 of the Criminal Code); Smuggling (Article 278 of the Criminal Code); Illicit trafficking (Article 277 of the Criminal Code) and other criminal offences which involve large and significant amounts of taxes, customs duties and other revenues.  Upon entry into force of the Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/ 04), based on an order by an investigative judge, i.e. an order of the Public Prosecutor, special investigative techniques may by applied, such as:    Interception of communications and entry into the home or other premises or vehicles in order to create conditions for interception of communications, under conditions and in a procedure established by law;    Access to and examination of computer systems, seizure of computer systems or parts thereof or the computer data storage base;    Secret monitoring, surveillance and visual-sound recording of persons and objects by use of technical devices;   Simulated trade of objects, and simulated offering and receiving bribes;    Controlled deliveries and transportation of persons and objects;    Use of undercover agents for surveillance and gathering information and data;    Opening a simulated bank account at which criminal proceeds may be deposited;   Registration of simulated legal entities or use of existing legal entities to gather information.  Special investigative techniques may be used only for purposes of gathering information and evidence necessary for successful processing of the case in criminal proceedings which cannot be otherwise gathered or their gathering would imply great difficulties; for crimes for which a prison sentence of at least four years has been prescribed; and for crimes for which at least five year prison sentence has been prescribed when there are reasonable suspicions that they have been committed by an organised group, gang or other criminal associations.  In cases when there is no information on the identity of the perpetrators of the crime, special investigative techniques may be applied regarding the objects of the crime.  In cases determined by law, in the pre-trial investigation, special investigative techniques may be applied only upon orders of the Public Prosecutor or investigative judge. They can also be applied in the investigation procedures upon an order of the investigative judge.  Special investigative techniques are applied in pre-trial proceedings upon written order of the investigative judge, which contains a relevant explanation and upon written and explained proposal of the Public Prosecutor. At this stage of the criminal proceedings, the investigative judge may issue a written order on the application of all special investigative techniques, except for the special investigative technique of interception of communications and entry into the home and other premises or vehicles for purposes of creating conditions for intercepting the communications. In case of a disagreement between the Public Prosecutor and the Investigative judge regarding the application of special investigative techniques, the Chamber of the Basic Court comprised of three judges shall decide on the matter.  In the pre-trial proceedings when there is no information on the identity of the perpetrators of the crime, special investigative techniques may be applied upon written and explained order issued by the Public Prosecutor, based on the written and explained proposal by the Ministry of the Interior. In such cases the Public Prosecutor may issue a written order for application of all special investigative measures, except for the application of the special investigative technique of interception of communications and entry into the home and other premises or vehicles for purposes of creating conditions for interception of communications, access and examination of the computer system and seizure of computer system and computer data storage base.  The Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia and the Financial Police execute the orders for application of special investigative techniques.  The orders shall contain the data about the person against whom special investigative techniques are applied when the perpetrator is known, the grounds of suspicion that the crime has been perpetrated, the facts on which special investigative techniques are applied and the manner, scope and duration of the measures.  The period in which special investigative techniques may be applied, except for the measure of interception of communications and entry into the home, premises or vehicles for purposes of creating conditions for interception of communications, may be of 4 months duration at most. However, upon proposal of the Public Prosecutor, in which case the orders are issued by an investigative judge, or upon proposal of the Ministry of the Interior, in which case the orders are issued by the Public Prosecutor, when there are justified reasons, the duration of the application of special investigative techniques may be prolonged for at least another three months.  If the special investigative techniques have been applied without orders of the investigative judge, i.e. without orders of the Public Prosecutor or have been applied in contravention of the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure, the evidence gathered in the application of such measures may not be used in criminal proceedings.  However, the information, reports, documents, objects gathered in the application of special investigative techniques may by used as evidence in criminal proceedings, under conditions and in a manner determined by the provisions of the Law on Criminal Procedure.  The conditions under which the special investigative technique of interception of communications and entry into the home, premises or vehicles for purposes of creating conditions for communication surveillance, may be applied; the issue of bodies competent to issue orders for the application of this special investigative technique; and the procedure for application of the measure of interception of communications, have been regulated in a separate law - Law on Interception of Communications, which is now in parliamentary procedure. For more details on this Law see I_H_16
6. What are the competencies of the different forces (legal and administrative, geographical organisation, cross-regional co-operation, etc.)? 
The existing structure of the police force, as well as its competencies are regulated with the Law on Internal Affairs and secondary legislation. The implementation of the Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03) has resulted in changes of the structure and competencies of the police forces, carried out in stages. Border Police was established based on the Law Amending the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/04). The Department for Organised Crime, became operational in Jannuary 2005.  According to the current (actually transitory) organisation, the structure of the police force is the following: The duties within the system of public security are performed by the Bureau of Public Security. The Bureau includes the Department for Border Police, the Department for Police and the Department for Criminal Police. The Department for Police performs the activities of direct enforcement of public law and order, road traffic regulation and security control of the lakes, as well as other duties, that by nature or circumstances require involvement of the uniformed police officers. The Special Task Unit and the Rapid Deployment Unit are functioning within the Department for Police as separate police forces competent to take actions on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia.  For the protection of security in the Republic of Macedonia in complex circumstances or violations of public law and order of greater extent, a special police unit within the Ministry of the Interior is established. The Special Unit is comprised of police members, and is run by a brigade commander. The Special Unit is established on the principle of secondment of police members within its composition, at a time and place determined by a special order in case of activation of the Special Unit. The orders for state of readiness and for its full direct involvement are given by the Minister of the Interior or, upon his/her authorisation, by the director of the Bureau for Public Security. The Department for Criminal Police performs duties of crime prevention, detection and apprehension of perpetrators of criminal offences, as well as forensic operations  The Department for Border Police performs duties of state border protection; control of the state border crossing points; detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border; and other activities established by law.  For performing certain tasks, such as analytics and research; security of persons and internal securing of buildings; aliens and immigration issues; defence preparations etc, special organisational units within the Bureau for Public Security are organised.  Following the implementation of the reform, these organisational units will operate within the new Department for Civil Affairs According to the Action Plan for the Reform Strategy, by the end of 2005, within the Bureau for Public Security, the following services shall operate: the Department for Border Police, Central Police Services and Territorial Police Services. Reform within the future Central Police Services has started with the introduction of the Department for Organised Crime. Concerning the setup of the Sectors for Internal Affairs see 24_G_02With regards to cooperation, the Sectors for Internal Affairs and the police stations cooperate and exchange information needed for performing police affairs. As for the international or interregional cooperation, they cooperate with the law enforcement agencies of all states bordering with the Republic of Macedonia and wider. The organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior carry out their tasks in accordance with the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02,33/03 and 19/04), the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border zone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and19/04), the Rulebook on the Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/98 and 15/03), the Decree on Use of Means of Force and Firearms ("“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 22/98 and 17/04), etc. For more details see 24_G_5
7. How are the police staffed and equipped and how are they financed (quantitative overview of staff, buildings, equipment, communication tools, hard- and software, etc.). Is an integrated computer-based investigation system available? 
The Ministry of the Interior has 12,462 employees in total, out of which 8,216 are police officers in uniform, 1,205 authorised officers in the Criminal Police, 508 are employed in the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence, 750 in the Territorial Fire Units and 1,777 on other posts within the Ministry. The Ministry of the Interior is financed from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The main source of funds are the original revenues of the Central Budget. Additional revenues, also stated in the Budget, come from charges collected by the Ministry and from additional activities – self-financing activities. Accordingly, in compliance with the regulations in this field, the financing of the Ministry of the Interior is carried out through three accounts, i.e. budgetary account, account for funds from revenue and account for self-financing activities. The budget of the Ministry of the Interior is mainly managed at central level, through the central services. Namely, the calculations and payment of salaries and contributions for all employees, as well as the procurement of uniforms and equipment - capital assets, is realised at central level through the Ministry of the Interior, while the procurement of consumables and services is realised through the regional organisational branches – Sectors of Internal Affairs. The Ministry of the Interior (central level) is responsible for keeping the records and compilations of the final accounts. The Ministry of the Interior has in total 136,688 square metres of facilities at its disposal. It is used for: the Headquarters of the Ministry; Sectors of Internal Affairs – 12 locations; Internal Affairs Bodies – 23 locations; Police stations – 120 locations; Special Tasks Unit and Special Rapid Deployment Unit – 5 locations; Police station for securing facilities and persons; Helicopter Unit; and Training and Handling Centre. The Main Office of the Ministry of the Interior and the main offices of the Sectors and Sections of Internal Affairs, as well as of 68 Police stations situated at the Sectors and Sections of Internal Affairs - have in total 88,973 square metres of office space at their disposal. The rest of the 52 Police stations, the Rapid Deployment Unit, Special Tasks Unit, the Police station for securing objects and persons, the Helicopter Unit, and the Training and Handling Centre are located at separate locations with a total of 41,715 square metres of space.  The average age of the facilities is 40 years, implying high maintenance costs, additional costs for instalation of modern heating and air-conditioning systems, and other refurbishings. Regarding weapons, the authorised officers are supplied with personal and formation weapons - handguns with calibres of 9 mm, 7.65 mm and 7.62 mm. The Ministry of the Interior also has handguns with  mm calibre, whereas the special police units have other more sophisticated weapons – guns and handguns with different calibres appropriate for special tasks. The structure of the Ministry’s vehicle pool is comprised mostly of cars from European and American manufacturers which satisfy the standards for performing police tasks regarding the visual and audio instruments. The Ministry of the Interior also has intervention vehicles LEND ROVER DEFFENDER and combat vehicles BTR and Hermelin. In 2005, it is expected that the equipping of the Border Police with vehicles will be done through CARDS projects. The total number of vehicles, including freight motor vehicles, is 2,500.  The Ministry of the Interior has three helicopters at its disposal, all functional and in good condition. The Lake Police has 13 vessels at its disposal - 1 speedboat and 12 motor boats.  The telecommunication equipment of the Ministry of the Interior is as follows:   An integrated communication network consisting of 52 communication nodes. The complete transfer of speech and data is carried out through this network.   The telephon system consists of 35 digital telephone exchanges and 120 small telephone exchanges, connecting more than 6,000 telephones.   The transfer of data is realised through a single Wide Area Network (WAN), connecting 55 Local Area Networks (LANs).   The Radio-Communications system is based on the VHF and UHF wavebands. The system is equipped with Storno and Motorola repeaters covering the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The Ministry is also equipped with mobile and stationary Motorola radio stations. The local computer network in the Ministry of the Interior is divided in two parts: 1.  The local network at the Ministry Main Office and the local network at the border crossing points, based on the Ethernet 10/100/1000 standard (IEE 802.3). 2.  The local network at the local organisational branch units, Sectors of Internal Affairs, and Department of Internal Affairs, based on the Token-ring standard. All the facilities, irrespective of the local network type, are cabled structurally, with an Ethernet cabling according to the strict standards of Nexans passive network elements and cabling. Depending on the local network type, appropriate active network components are used:   Appropriate switches and hubs for the token-ring network (IBM token-ring hub, CAU, MAU).   Appropriate switches and hubs for the Ethernet network (CISCO switches, hubs). The complete information system of the Ministry of the Interior is centralised on servers located at the Main Office facilities. The access to the central server (IBM mainframe) goes through standard terminals or personal computers with IBM Personal Communications installed, while the communication goes through Telnet (TCP/IP protocol) or through IEEE 802.2 (SNA protocol). The access to other servers goes through the TCP/IP protocol. Most of the activities of the information system of the Ministry of the Interior, which include entries, updates and direct data search in the central records, are performed through the central server in the Ministry (an IBM Mainframe). There are approximately 200,000 on-line daily transactions on the central server, while the peaks reach 10 to 15 transactions per second. During everyday operations, 400 to 500 terminals from the total of 1000 terminals, connected to the network of the central computer server of the Ministry, are simultaneously active. The availability of the central server is 24x7x365, and it has the following characteristics:   IBM Multiprise 2003/206 with 512 MB RAM working on 17.4 MIPS with 12 parallel channels   6 HDD with 9 GB each (54GB) in mirror (means physically 12 HDD)   2 OSA2 adapters with TR/ETH enabled With regard to the system and application software, this server employs the VM/ESA 2.4 and VM/ESA 2.3.2 operating systems, the CICS/VSE 2.3 transaction server, the Language Environment 1.4 application development package, and the DB2 (relational) and DL/I, VSAM (hierarchical) databases. Apart from the central server, other servers are also used, e.g. file, mail, DNS communication server, as well as the criminal intelligence server. These servers are located at the Ministry’s Main Office and have the following technical characteristics: Fujitsu Siemens PrimePower 650 with 6GB RAM working on UNIX operating system SUN Solaris v8 1 piece IBM Netfinity 5500 with 512 MB RAM working on Windows 2000 operating system 3 pieces IBM Netfinity 5000 with 256 MB RAM working on Windows 2000 operating system 2 pieces IBM Netfinity 3000 with 128 MB RAM working on Windows 2000 operating system 3 pieces PC Compatible Server with 256 MB RAM working on Windows 2000 operating system 3 pieces In the work of the Border Police for the control of the state border crossings, local servers connected in local networks at the relevant border crossing pointss are used. These servers have the following technical characteristic, PC Compatible Server with 256 MB RAM working on Windows NT operating system  -13 pieces. At the moment, the Ministry does not have an integrated computer system for criminal intelligence. The analysts and inspectors conducting investigations have direct access to the computer records of the Ministry of the Interior and in all regional branches of the Ministry during the collection of data relevant for the investigation. Only the organisational branch for combating drugs and narcotics has an application for conducting investigations - CISNIC (Criminal Information System for National and International Cooperation) which is a donation from the UNDCP. This application is integrated in the software tool for intelligence analysis Analyst Notebook (i2) and allows completely computerised conduct of the investigative procedures. At the moment, these applications for computerised conduct of investigations are regionally limited and used only at central level, at the organisational unit for combating drugs and narcotics at the Main Office of the Ministry.
8. Please describe the training system for police officers. Which training facilities and training programmes exist (schools, training content, target groups, knowledge networks, special skills)? 
The Police Academy is a higher education institution in the area of security. The Police Academy educates personnel for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior and other agencies, institutions and legal entities performing activities in the area of security. The Police Academy provides education for: 1.  Acquiring a university degree (graduate studies); 2.  Acquiring a professional degree - specialist 3.  Acquiring a scientific degree - MA 4.  Acquiring a scientific degree – PhD 5.  Vocational education and training for persons who have already acquired a degree at other educational institutions:   Basic police education and training   Special education and training    Education and training for management in the area of security (security management). The Police Academy has two levels of education: higher education and continuing education.  Higher education at the Police Academy is intended for graduate and postgraduate (professional and scientific) studies. The graduate studies are organised as four-year studies, following study programmes and subject - oriented curricula.  The organisational structure of the higher education at the Police Academy envisages six departments: Department of Criminalistics, Department of Police Sciences, Department of Criminal Law and Criminology, Department of Security Sciences, Department of Security in the Private Sector and Department of Social, Political and Legal Sciences. In the fourth year of studies, there are four specialist studies: Criminalistics and Criminology, Security, Security in the Private Sector, and Police-Operative studies. Under these specialist studies, students are trained to fight certain types of crime, such as organised crime, computer crime, terrorism, traffic violations, juvenile delinquency, crimes against the environment, economic and financial criminality. At the Academy, students are trained in the following academic skills:  information technology; foreign languages; Macedonian language and culture; and special physical training. Police officers who wish to acquire higher education may enrol at the Academy, as part-time students According to the study programme, the Police Academy educates professionals with higher education in the areas of criminalistics, security and police sciences, for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior and other institutions engaged in these areas. In addition to the graduate studies, the Police Academy organises two year postgraduate scientific studies (MA studies) and one year postgraduate expert studies (specialisation studies). These programmes are designed to educate/train experts for fight against certain types of crime. PhD degree can also be acquired at the Academy. The Academy provides continuing education for persons who have already acquired a degree, organising basic police officer training, special training and training for security management. a) Basic Police Officer Training The Basic Police Officer Education and Training is organised for persons who are employed at the Ministry of the Interior, without previous police experience at jobs with special obligations and competencies. The Basic Police Officer Training lasts one year, out of which three months are dedicated to practical field training. b) Special Education and Training The Special Education and Training is organised for persons who are employed at the Ministry of the Interior, with previously completed basic police training, working experience and achievements in their work. Depending on the type of work and complexity of the tasks, special training based on special curricula is organised for fight against certain types of criminality and social pathologies. The duration of this training depends on its contents, but is not longer than 12 months. c) Police Management Training The Police Management Education and Training is organised for persons who are employed at the Ministry of the Interior and is used to upgrade their skills in management and commanding of police structures and relations. The duration of the training depends on its contents/curriculum, but is not longer than 12 months. The Police Academy also organises courses on: Basic Police Officer Training The contents of the training can be grouped in the following study areas:  
  Police work in a democratic society, and legal regulations   Police conduct, and legal regulations   Criminalistics with criminology   General education contents (Macedonian language and Orthography, foreign language, information technology, telecommunications and first aid)   Current issues related to improvement of police work. 
Special skills taught: 
  Defence techniques (self-defence) with general physical training and test of skills   Weapons handling, shooting and camping   Practical exercises and field training  Foreign language  Information Technology 
Target group: persons with completed secondary school (up to 25 years of age) and newly employed staff at the Ministry of the Interior that after the successful completion of the training would continue working at the Ministry as fully skilled police officers.  
Basic training for the Border Police (of 3-month duration) 
Contents of training can be grouped within the following study areas: 
  General police education   Legal and criminalistics area   Police conduct 
Special skills: 
  Defence police techniques  Information technology 
Target group: persons with completed secondary education who are already employed in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, and are trained to work as police officers at the Border Police. 
Management training for the Border Police (of 3 months duration)  
Contents of the training: acquiring basic skills in the police, legal, criminalistic, managerial and other related areas for the commanding personnel of the Border Police Regional Centres and training them as competent police staff to perform police and management related tasks in securing the state border 
Special skills: 
  Techniques of application of police competencies  Information technology 
Target group: officers of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia – Border Brigade, who are trained to become senior officers at the Border Police. The Police Academy is a member of the European Association of Police Colleges. At regional level, the Academy cooperates with the Police Academies from the region and wider especially with the Police Academies from the Netherlands, Turkey and Estonia; exchange experiences, teaching staff and students; and implement projects, etc 9. Is there training tailored to the fight against specific types of crime? 
In the Republic of Macedonia there is training designed following the requirements for fight against specific types of crime. In the framework of the four-year graduate studies at the Police Academy, four modules are envisaged in the fourth year of studies: criminalistics and criminology, security, security in the private sector, and police-operative. The study programs of these modules encompass studies of certain types of crime, such as organised crime, terrorism, traffic violations, juvenile delinquency, crimes against the environment, and economic and financial crime. In addition to graduate studies, in cooperation with the Ministry of the Interior, the Police Academy has designed special program for basic training in the field of organised crime, which covers all personnel (155 in total), that after the Reform of the Ministry are assigned to work in the Department for Organised Crime. The realisation of this Program started in mid January 2005, following the completion of the procedure of personnel assignment. Considering the large size of the group, the training is carried out in 4 cycles. The managerial personnel is covered by the first training cycle, and in April 2005, this personnel will attend specialist management training.  The designed training programme for fight against organised crime envisages studying several topics, such as:    Organisational structure and the competences of the Department:    Detailed introduction to the new organisational scheme and the competencies of the Department for Organised Crime and the separate organisational units is a pre-condition for providing effectiveness in the operation and exercise of the legally prescribed competencies. This introduction will facilitate acquiring more detailed knowledge about the coordinative-supervisory function at central level, the method for transferring competences from the central to the local level, as well as acquiring knowledge on professional performance standards.    The latest amendments to the national legislation:    The latest amendments to the national criminal law legislation (The Criminal Code and the Law on Criminal Procedure) are the newly adopted laws – the Draft Law on Interception of Communications, the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office, the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and other Proceeds of Crime, and other laws. In this context, the newly established crimes are elaborated, as well as the amendments to the criminal law procedure and legal possibilities for witness protection, and implementation of the special investigation measures (SIM)   Multidisciplinary approach   With an aim of providing indispensable multidisciplinary approach in the work, as well as to gain understanding of the competencies of institutions involved in the fight against organised crime, money laundering and corruption, the representatives from the Public Prosecutor’s Office, assigned to work at the Unit for Fight Against  Organised Crime are invited to participate in the training programme. Representatives from other institutions with competencies in the fight against organised crime, such as the Financial Police, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, the Anti-Corruption State Commission, and others, are involved when elaborating other topics.    Up to-date working methods   The training is particularly focused on elaboration of up to-date working methods in the field of detection of activities of organised criminal groups. In addition to application of SIM, the training particularly elaborate the Information Technology skills and knowledge of databases, criminal intelligence and intelligence analysis, as well as the pro-active methods for conducting financial investigations in parallel with criminal investigations, in order to secure effective confiscation of the proceeds from crime. The training for application of the up to-date methods, in certain aspects is conducted in parallel with the training for implementation of the new legal regulations.    International instruments and cooperation   The international instruments and international cooperation are of particular importance for establishing of effective system for fight against organised crime. In the course of the training, the most important international instruments and possibilities for international cooperation under the mentioned instruments, as well as indictments and the conduct of judicial proceedings, are particularly elaborated. 
10. Is there functioning co-operation with liaison officers in third countries within the common framework? If yes, where do such liaison officers exist? 
The police cooperation with third countries is being realised through INTERPOL liaison officers and channels, the SECI (South-eastern Europe Cooperation Initiative) liaison officers, and liaison officers from third countries appointed in the Republic of Macedonia.  SECI Center for Combating Transborder Crime There are liaison officers from the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration appointed at the SECI Centre in Bucharest. Within the Sector for International Police Cooperation at the Ministry of the Interior, a National Single Point of First Contact for the SECI Center was established, The exchange of knowledge, information and data between the services of Republic of Macedonia and third countries is conducted through the appointed officers in Republic of Macedonia and the main office of the SECI Centre. Bulgaria There is a liaison officer from the Republic of Bulgaria appointed in the Republic of Macedonia, with main office at the Bulgarian Embassy in Skopje, through which a direct cooperation with the Bulgarian police is established. Scandinavian countries The cooperation with the Scandinavian countries operates through the Nordic liaison officer located at the Norwegian Embassy in Sofia, Bulgaria. Canada The cooperation with Canada is conducted through the liaison officer located at the Canadian Embassy in Rome, Italy. United States of America The International Criminal Investigative Training Assistance Program (ICITAP) has appointed a police task advisor at the US Embassy in Skopje. The police cooperation with different agencies from the USA (DEA, FBI, US Secret Service) functions through the Regional Safety Office (RSO) at the US Embassy in Skopje. In addition, a direct and long-term cooperation is also established with the DEA Office in Athens and the US Secret Service in Bucharest. The cooperation in training of the personnel is also conducted through the US Embassy in Skopje at the FBI Law Enforcement Academy – ILEA in Budapest. United Nations The National Project Office within the UN Drugs and Crime Office is an agency for technical support and cooperation, The office is located in Skopje and a liaison officer for cooperation with the Ministry of the Interior is appointed there. International Criminal Tribunal for Former Yugoslavia  The Ministry of the Interior has appointed a liaison officer for direct cooperation with the Office of the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia with a main office in Skopje. After this Office was closed in August 2004 the cooperation continued through the main office of the Tribunal with in Prishtina, as well as in a manner of direct communication with the representatives of the Prosecution Office of the International Criminal Tribunal for Former Yugoslavia in Hague.  11. Describe the co-operation with neighbouring countries (also as regards border control and border surveillance)? Which police cooperation agreements exist or are planned? 
In order to improve the cooperation with the neighbouring countries, the Ministry of the Interior undertakes activities on concluding agreements and cooperation promotion. The cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the neighbouring countries is carried out through concluding bilateral agreements. The Republic of Macedonia cooperates with the neighbouring countries, as follows: Republic of Albania The following agreements are concluded with the Republic of Albania:   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of Republic of Albania on Cooperation in Combating Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and other Illegal activities, concluded in Skopje on 17.06.2004. The Agreement is expected to be ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in the first quarter of 2005.  Agreement between the Macedonian Government and Albanian Government on Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Signage at the Macedonian-Albanian State border dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). A Joint Committee is established for implementation of this Agreement. 
  Agreement between the Macedonian Government and Albanian Government on Abolition of Visas for diplomatic and official travel documents and the amount of fees for issuing other types of visas, dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98).   Agreement between the Macedonian Government and Albanian Government on International Transport of Passengers and Goods in the Road Traffic, dated 15.01.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/98).   Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Maintenance, Renovation and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Marks (Signage) dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). In accordance with the Agreement, a Joint Committee was established as well as two sector committees for recovery of the border marks and demarcation of the border line on the Macedonian – Albanian state border. The Joint Committee held its first meeting on 04.12.1998 in Skopje;   Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Regulation of the Cross - Border Traffic of Persons in the Border Zone dated 04.12.1987, ratified on 19.03.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/98). The Agreement foresees the establishment of a Permanent Joint Macedonian-Albanian Committee, determines its competencies, tasks, meeting modality and ways of operation;   Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Prevention and Resolving the Incidents on the Macedonian - Albanian State Border Line dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). On the basis of this Agreement a Main Joint Macedonian – Albanian Committee on Border Incidents was established, as well as two sector joint committees on border incidents, for both border sectors;     Agreement on Cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania dated 16.07.2000. On the basis of this Agreement, the following documents were also signed:    A Protocol on Defining Directions and Modes of Cooperation in the Field of Border Crossing Control and Prevention of Illegal Migration between the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia dated 16.07.2000;   Protocol on Cooperation in the Security Field between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the National Information Service of Albania dated 05.06.1992;   Memorandum of Understanding between the Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Albania on Cooperation and Promotion of Contacts dated 05.02.2003. It is also noteworthy to mention the project document “Danida” on strengthening the border cooperation between Republic of Albania and the Republic of Macedonia regarding the border line Debar-Diber, signed on January 2004 between the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the Ministry of the Interior and Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia.   The goal of this project is the strengthening of safety and establishment of reciprocal trust on the border line Debar-Diber between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Albania through a close cooperation in identifying, prevention and fight against the cross-border crime and illegal activities, throughout the following:    Improvement of the information exchange and communication;   Providing education and training;    Preparation and strengthening of joint actions and join control; and    Preparation of a legal framework - Memorandum of Understanding.  The harmonisation of positions regarding the Memorandum of Understanding between the Ministry of the Interior and Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania for promotion and strengthening of the cooperation in the field of border security is currently underway (the signing of this Memorandum should take place in the first half of 2005).  The consolidation of the text of the Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Albania on Readmission of Persons whose stay is illegal, i.e. Agreement on Readmission, is in progress.    Republic of Greece The following agreements are concluded with the Republic of Greece:   Interim agreement dated 13.09.1995 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/95);, confirmed the mutual existing border between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Greece as permanent and inviolable international border.    Protocol on Cooperation between the Ministry of the Interiorof Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of Republic of Greece, signed in Ohrid, on 08.07.1998.   Protocol on Cross-border Cooperation dated 23.06.1998.  With the above mentioned Protocol both parties agreed that until a bilateral agreement is signed, their mutual relations regarding the state border between the two states would be managed according to the provision of the Protocol between the Government of FNRY and the Government of Kingdom of Greece on securing, maintenance and renovation of the border marks (signage) (land and water) on the Yugoslav-Greek border as well as, on alert, prevention, methods of investigation and resolving of border incidents, signed on 17.12.1958. On the basis of the abovementioned Protocol, a Joint Committee on securing, maintenance and recovery of the border signage and resolving the border incidents was established, holding regular meetings. At this moment, in addition to the above mentioned, it is an already established practice with the Republic of Greece to maintain regular working meetings between the services directly involved in the state border security and simultaneously, a link for information exchange pertaining to the border security was established.  
Republic of Bulgaria The following agreements are concluded with the Republic of Bulgaria:   Agreement on Cooperation in the Security Field between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria dated 20.10.1992, ratified in 1993 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/93).On the basis of this Agreement, between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria on 20.10.1992 the following document was also signed:   Protocol on Determining the Directions, Mode and Order of Cooperation in the Field of the Border Control and Prevention of the Illegal Immigration;    Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Readmission of Persons with Illegal Stay dated 04.06.2001, ratified in 2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Measures for Prevention and Resolving Border Incidents on the Macedonian – Bulgarian border dated 15.05.2000, ratified on 23.01.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/2002). With the Agreement, a main joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Commission on border incidents was established, as well as two sector Joint Committees on Border Incidents that are maintaining regular meetings;    Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Securing Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and the Border Marks on the Macedonian-Bulgarian state border, signed on 15.05.2000, ratified on 23.01.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002). On the basis of the above mentioned Agreement, a Joint Committee on Securing, Maintenance, Renovation and Marking of the Macedonian-Bulgarian border was established;     Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Criminal Offences dated 26.02.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 6/2003).On the basis of this Agreement, a Protocol on Cooperation between the Police Department – Sector on Border Crossing Points within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the National Service Border Police within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria was signed in 2003;   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on International Road Transport, ratified in 1999(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 23/99);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Opening Two New International Border Crossing Points between the two countries, ratified in 1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/99);   Agreement between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria on establishment of international telephone line, “Vardar”, concluded in Sofia, Republic of Bulgaria on 29 September, 2004.  
Serbia and Montenegro 
  Agreement between the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia and the Republic of Macedonia Concerning the Delineation and Description of the State Border dated 23.02.2001, ratified in March 2001(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/01). On the basis of this Agreement a Joint Committee for the Demarcation was established and simultaneously the demarcation of the state border was initiated. Until now, from the junction of the three state borders - the Republic of Macedonia, the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro and the Republic of Bulgaria to the border crossing point Tabanovce, all main border marks are placed and also about 90% from the assisting border marks;   Protocol on Opening Border Crossing Points for Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro dated 29.03.2003, as well as the modalities for its implementation;   Memorandum between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Serbia on Cooperation in Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences, signed on 25.07.2003;   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Montenegro on Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences, signed on 10.06.2003, ratified on 22.07.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 52/2003).   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Removal of Visas, dated  03.07.1997, ratified on 25.09.1997 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 50/97).   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on International Road Transport of Passengers and Goods dated 04.09.1996, ratified on 18.12.1996 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/96).   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Regulation of Border Railroad Traffic, dated 04.09.1996, ratified on 18.12.1996 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/96).   Protocol for Opening Border Crossing Points for Cross-border’ Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro dated 29.03.2003, as well as modalities for implementation. The harmonisation of the positions regarding the Agreement Proposal on the basis of cooperation for securing the State border between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro is in progress. UNMIK The following Agreements are concluded with UNMIK:   Protocol on cooperation between the Ministry of the Interiorof the Republic of Macedonia and UNMIK (27.11.2003)    Memorandum of Understanding between the Republic of Macedonia and UNMIK dated 2001    Protocol for Police Cooperation, dated 29.08.2002    On the basis of the Protocol on Opening New Border Crossing Points for Small-Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro, an Interim Protocol on determining Temporary Border Crossing Points for ’small border’ Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and UNMIK (Tanusevci and Strezimir) is signed.  Regarding the cross-border cooperation with the UNMIK, the established practice of holding regular working meetings between the representatives of the border services of the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK aimed at information exchange regarding the issues occurring within the everyday operation of the border crossing points is very useful. 12. Please describe the reforms of the police that have been implemented in recent years. 
The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (17.11.1991) has created a foundation for establishing a legal state on democratic principals which implies legality and legitimacy in proceeding of all state bodies, including the police.  In the transition process specific are the features in the etiology and phenomenology of the crime, appearance of new forms and kinds of crime with elements of violence, appearance of organised and trans-national crime (trafficking in human beings, trafficking in weapons/arms and drugs, terrorism, money laundering, corruption etc). In the past years, activities aiming at developing an adequate security structure have been intensified.  Series of steps for strengthening the capacities for functioning of the Ministry of the Interior have been implemented in accordance with the goals and basic work principles; promotion of the work methodology and; adequate structuring and determining of the competencies of the police according to the needs of the security system in the Republic of Macedonia.  Transfer of competencies to the Border Police The transfer of the competencies for border security from the Army to the Police is one of the main features of the reform processes in the police, which is realised in accordance with a determined Strategy. For more details see 24_A_08.   Asylum and Migration  Issues concerning migration and asylum are of special significance for the Repubic of Macedonia. According to the National Action Plan for Migration and Asylum, the national legislation is being harmonised with the European standards and the regional co-operation in this sphere is strengthened which fully corresponds with the goals of the process of stabilisation and association of the Republic of Macedonia in the structures of the European Union.   Human resources development    In the past period, the way of education and training of the police staff for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior and other security structures in the Republic of Macedonia was carried out at the Police High School (established 1972) and at the Faculty of Security and Civil Self-defence (established 1977). In the period since 1995, according to the Law on Establishment of Centre for Education of Security Personnel (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 27/95 and 98/02), the Centre for Education of the Security Personnel was an educational institution for secondary vocational education of personnel for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior. The last enrolment of candidates in the Police High School was in 1997/98, the last generation completed its education in the school year of 1999/2000. In accordance with the aforementioned law, the Faculty of Security and Civil Self-defence ceased to exist on 31.09.2003. With the termination of the regular higher education in this field, as well as with cessation of the enrolment of the pupils in the Police High School, certain vacuum appeared that had negative consequences for providing continuous education of personnel for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior and for other security structures in the Republic of Macedonia. Therefore, a new system for education of the security personnel was established, which through various levels of police education and with clear and precise goals provides a profile of police qualification in accordance with the European and international standards.  According to the Law on Police Academy (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/03) a Police Academy has been established, where personnel for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior and other state bodies, organisations, institutions, and legal entities who are dealing with security is educated. Upon completion of the high education, the personnel achieves the following degrees: professional degree - specialist, academic degree – Master of Science and academic degree – PhD. In addition, the Police Academy is providing continuous training for persons with completed certain level of education (basic police training, special training and training for managing in security area) which will provide them with high degree of initiatives, professionalism and expertise while performing working tasks.   Establishment of system with professional standards   The Ministry of the Interior continuously works on establishing institutional capacities that will enable immediate solving and documenting of the overstepping of legal authorisation, as well as other illegal actions committed by the members of the Ministry. Regarding this, a Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards is operating within the Ministry and is continuously developing and upgrading according to the best world standards and practices in this fields.  This organisational unit is established above all from the need to enhance the quality in conducting investigations on the basis of appeals and complaints related to illegal and unprofessional conduct of members of the Ministry, as well as for detecting and adequate documenting of illegal activities and conduct of the members of the Ministry. In accordance with the comparative experiences and standards in this field, a special component monitoring the realisation of the financial and material funds is established within this Sector. Namely, regular and continuous cheks are performed on the managing of the financial funds of the Ministry and its regular and legal usage.   In accordance with its competencies, the Ministry of the Interior conducts compulsory investigations of cases where fire arms were used on behalf of its members that resulted with injuries or death of a certain person. These cases are investigated by a separate body in accordance with the current methodology, the fundamental postulates of the system of internal control and the professional standards passed under the competencies of the Sector on Internal Control and Professional Standards.   "Community policing’’ Concept The Ministry of the Interior is firmly commited to enhance the cooperation between the police and the citizens. This commitment originates from the strategic objective of the Republic of Macedonia to adopt the European standards in all areas of its functioning. This commitment is accomplished in the scope of the reform process that should enable the Ministry to adopt the best practices of the European Union through a construction of a model of police organisation directed at affirmation of the social values, and of effective engagement and complete performing of police functions which will contribute for improvement of the quality of living, protection of the rights and providing peace and coexistence among all citizens of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Ministry of the Interior, within its legal competencies and in cooperation with the international organisations in the Republic of Macedonia, after the successful implementation of the Main Plan for return of the police in the former crisis areas, the return of the larger part of the internally displaced persons and after establishing the police functions through the temporary police stations and patrolling of the ethnically-mixed patrols, carried out voluminous and intensive activities for building mutual trust and partnership between the police and the local population.  Using the comparative experiences from the great number of countries where the cooperation between the police and the local population is functioning successfully, the Ministry of the Interior, in cooperation with the Department on the Police Development within OSCE, works on continuous implementation of this concept, whose objective is strengthening the relations between the local population and the police through partnership, improvement of the communication and information exchange. The cited concept of cooperation between the police and the citizens represents one of the basic postulates of the Project Strategy on Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03), through planning adequate implementation within the framework of the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior as a modern model of police organisation.  International police co-operation and international co-operation   Since 1992, the Ministry of the Interior started with intensive activities for establishing an international cooperation, first of all, through establishing bilateral cooperation in the field of security with the neighbouring countries and with the countries from the region, and through establishing bilateral and multilateral cooperation with the countries in Europe and in the world.   Recognising the threat from the phenomena of organised crime, the Republic of Macedonia undertook broad scope of activities and measures for providing adequate and effective approach towards this problem, in accordance with the relevant standards and best practices of the European Union.   Part of the activities of the Ministry of the Interior is a creation of institutional capacities for establishing international police cooperation and their concentration in one organisational unit within the framework of the Ministry. After acquiring the status of a state member of INTERPOL, the Republic of Macedonia took over the activities for establishing of organisational unit within the structures of the Ministry of the Interior and created a special Unit – INTERPOL – Skopje, which is gradually developing and strengthening by receiving status of a special SECTOR for NCB (National Central Bureau) INTERPOL. Confronting organised crime as one of the most serious threats for each country, and simultaneously recognising the place and the organisational layout of the services whose task is the cooperation with the criminal police from the foreign countries, the Ministry of the Interior in 2003 established a Sector on International Police Co-operation that covers relevant segments in the international co-operation of the Ministry of the Interior with INTERPOL, SECI Center for Combating Transborder Crime, EUROPOL, SIRENE etc.   In the Ministry of the Interior, a special organisational unit – Sector for European Integration and International Cooperation is established, whose main competence is following, organising and coordinating the international activities and cooperation of the Ministry on inter-state, regional and international level through concluding and implementing international legal instruments.   On Police reforms see also I_F_05 and I_F_07
13. What are the current and future priorities of the police? 
The Strategic Priorities of the Police are established by the Strategy for Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03), and the specific measures and activities with the adopted Action Plan. From these documents emanate the immediate priorities of the police:     Efficient finalisation of the new organisational structure of the police (see 24_Annex_04) – (it encompasses finalisation of the framework of primary legislation and by-laws – Law on Police, Amendments to the Law on Internal Affairs) and start of operation in line with the adopted Strategy .    Harmonisation of the legislation with the European standards (Law on Aliens, Law on Surveillance of the State Border and other acts).     Building of a human resources development system as a complementary process. In this context is the further improvement of the appropriate and equitable representation, with a simultaneous respect for the merit-system, strengthening of the professional standards and the internal control.    Development of cooperation with the local communities, especially in circumstances of decentralisation, including the implementation of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/02) regarding the appointment of heads of sectors for internal affairs. These immediate priorities are also related to:    Strengthening of crime prevention;   Improvement in the coordination of the activities between the Police and other law enforcement agencies;   Strengthening of the international police cooperation (especially EUROPOL).  
14. Describe the capacity of the police for detecting corruption and serious economic crime. 
Within the Ministry of the Interior, a Department for Organised Crime is operating. Its scope of working tasks encompasses detection of corruption and severe types of economic and financial crime. The Department for Organised Crime, according to the current systematisation of working positions, has 135 criminalistics inspectors and its operations are managed by an Undersecretary in the Ministry.  In the framework of the Criminal Police, within 12 regional Sectors and 23 Sectors on Internal Affairs, Sections and Inspectorates for suppression of the organised crime operate. Their  priority task and obligation is to detect severe economic crime and corruption. Within the regional units of the Ministry of the Interior, the total number of police personnel that performs tasks on suppression of organised crime is 116, including 21 managers. All the police personnel performing tasks in this field possess university education, and majority of them have finished various specialist courses and seminars organised by national and foreign police and scientific experts, where topics and experience in the field of organised crime have been elaborated.   Activities on suppression of corruption and severe types of economic crime are directly carried out by the Sector for Financial crime, comprised of Section for Economic Crime and Section for Money Laundering and Corruption. It continuously monitors the conditions, movements and different forms of economic and financial crime and corruption, and accordingly, plans and organises most appropriate and efficient measures and activities for prevention and suppression of the mentioned criminal activities. Within this framework, the Sector cooperates with other organisational units in the Ministry, State administration authorities, legal entities, foreign police services and international organisations; conducts supervision over the work of the police Sectors; provide expert and other assistance in the suppression of the economic and financial crime and corruption; plans and carries out training of inspectors in this field; participates in the creation of legislation, reports and other expert materials; and performs other affairs within its scope of work.  For the purpose of detection and investigation of all gathered information, a direct cooperation with the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption has been established, and quality coordination is provided. In particular, this is related to cases when the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption has delivered information on cases of non-compliance with the laws and cases of corruption, especially in the Civil Service and other Public Sector institutions.   It should be emphasised that the police personnel is trained to deal with this kind of criminal offences but, there is a need for additional strengthening of the capacities of the Ministry of the Interior in order to perform more successful completion of pre-trial procedures on cases of corruption. In this view, an accent shall be placed on technical upgrading, computer equipping, and additional technical assets and vehicles.    The adoption of the Law Amending the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/2004) has provided the necessary conditions for increased efficiency in detection of corruption and severe forms of economic crime by introducing special investigating measures for providing required evidence, such as:     monitoring of communications and entrance in home or other premisesor means of transport, for creating conditions for monitoring of communications, under conditions and in a procedure established by law.   an insightand search in the computer system, seizure of computer system or its part, or database for storage of computer data:   secret, surveilance and monitoring and visual-sound taping persons and objects with technical equipment;   simulated purchase of objects, as well as simulated bribering, and simulated acceptance of a bribe;    controlled delivery and transport of persons and objects;   using methodology of undercover identity for the purpose of monitoring and gathering information and data;   opening a simulated bank account where financial means originating from committed crime may be deposited, and     registration of simulated legal entities and utilising the existing legal entities for the purpose of data collection.  With the implementation of the Strategy for Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03), which is implemented gradually and the establishing of a comprehensive set of activities in the field of organised crime, as well as with the mentioned amendments of the legal regulations, the conditions for successful and qualitative fight against all forms of organised crime are established.   15. Is corruption a problem within the police force? If yes, which measures are undertaken to improve the situation? Does a code on police ethics exist? How is it enforced? 
a) The Ministry of the Interior performs its function through various organisational units where the employees have direct contacts with the citizens, and therefore certain forms of corruption appear. In that view, the Ministry, i.e. the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards and the Crime Police Department undertake measures on detection and providing evidence for cases of corruption, and after documenting the case, appropriate petition requests are submitted.  As a result of the already undertaken measures and activities, cases of corruption are detected among the employees who perform activities in the field of traffic control, control of the state border crossing and administrative-supervision affairs, and if there is evidence for committed criminal offence of receiving a bribe, criminal charges are submitted to the Public Prosecutor’s Office against those employees.  In cases of violation of working discipline or non-fulfilment of working duties by the employee of the Ministry, pursuant to Article 133 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”„Nos. 8/98, 11/98, 12/00, 2/03 and 3/04), a proposal for initiating procedure for determining the responsibility will be submitted to the Commission for handling dismissal proceedings.  After the hearing and presentation of evidence, the Commission establishes the responsibility of the employee and creates a written proposal to the Minister with regards of bringing appropriate decision. If the Commission establishes that the employee is not responsible or that the conditions for bringing decision for termination of the labour relations by dismissal are not fulfilled, it makes a proposal to the Minister to reject the proposal, i.e. to terminate the procedure. If the Minister does not agree with the proposal, he/she may return the case for reviewing if the factual situation has been irregularly or incompletely established, or the substantive regulation has been erroneously applied, or a different decision may be brought. Depending on the level of employee’s responsibility, the conditions under which the violation of working duties has been made, the previous performance and conduct, the seriousness of the violation and its consequences, the Minister may replace the dismissal with a fine which may not exceed 15% of the total monthly salary paid for a period of 1 to 6 months.   In addition to this, pursuant to Article 142, paragraph 6 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.15/97), the Ministry of the Interior, on the basis of collected evidences and information, brings criminal charge against an employee who has performed action that represents a criminal offence, and together with all evidence and writings for undertaken measures and activities, submits it to the competent Public Prosecutor.  In the period between 01.01 and 31.12.2002, due to established cases of abuses or corruptive behaviour of the employees in the Ministry of the Interior, disciplinary procedures for establishing responsibility for violation of working discipline were initiated against 53 employees.  Out of this, upon a proposal of the Commission for dismissal, decisions for dismissal were brought in 9 cases, decision for fine were brought in 41 cases, and in 3 cases, due to lack of evidence, the procedure was suspended.  In the period between 01.01 and 31.12.2003, due to established cases of abuses or corruptive behaviour of the employees in the Ministry of the Interior, 274 disciplinary procedures for establishing responsibility for violation of working discipline were initiated against 280 employees. Upon a proposal of the Commission for dismissal, decisions for dismissal were brought in 94 cases, decision for fine were brought in 156 cases, and in 30 cases, due to lack of evidence, the procedure was suspended. In addition, in the same period, due to existence of grounds for suspicion for committed crime, criminal charges were submitted to the competent Public Prosecutor against 121 employees of the Ministry of the Interior  In the period between 01.01 and 01.11.2004, due to established cases of abuses or corruptive behaviour of the employees in the Ministry of the Interior, 245 disciplinary procedures for establishing responsibility for violation of working discipline were initiated against 260 employees. Upon a proposal of the Commission for dismissal, decisions for dismissal were brought in 35 cases, decisions for fine were brought in 198 cases, and in 27 cases, due to lack of evidence, the procedure was suspended. In addition, in the same period, due to the existence of grounds for suspicion for committed crime, criminal charges were submitted to the competent Public Prosecutor against 38 employees of the Ministry of Internal Affairs. b) Pursuant to Article 74 paragraph 2 of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), the Minister of the Interior adopted the Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 3/04; see 24_Annex_05).  Article 1, paragraph 1 of the Code of Police Ethics prescribes the conduct, organisation, performance and objectives of the Police; the legal basis for the police function; the relationship between the Police and the Criminal Justice System; the qualifications, the selection process, recruitment and training of Poli
 Personnel; the police interventions, the accountability and control of the Police; and the research and international cooperation, for the purpose of compliance with the basic principles and recommendations incorporated in the European Code of Police Ethics adopted by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 19.09.2001. Paragraph 2 of the same Article determines that “the Police Personnel is obliged to comply with the provision of this Code” and in accordance with Article 133, paragraph 1, point 1 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, non-compliance with the provisions related to the police ethics are considered as basis for initiating procedure for establishing responsibility in cases of violation of working discipline.  Considering the aforementioned, the provisions of the Code are compulsory implemented within the everyday operations of the Ministry of the Interior by all its structural units, according to their scope of work. 16. What is done in the field of crime prevention? 
The Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03, and 19/04) and the Rulebook on the Manner of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 12/98 and 15/03), prescribe the activities of a preventive structure for suppression of crime, aiming at general prevention. Pursuant to the Rulebook, it is prescribed that:   The authorised officers, in order to prevent committing of criminal acts and other socialy destructive behaviour, undertake planned measures to determine the reasons that cause these acts and behaviour;      overview of the phenomenal and manifestation patterns of criminal behaviour is performed by continuous monitoring and analyses of the patterns, for the purpose of adequate direction of the preventive activity;   The general preventive activity is realised through:   quality material documentation regarding other social damaging behaviour,   undertaking joint preventive activities with other institutions or subjects that are competent for realisation of educational, socio-humanitarian objectives, objectives of guardianship and other similar objectives, their inclusion or initiating common activities,    adequate clear presentation of practical experiences concerning successfully performed  activities of preventive organisation and action. The direct preventive engagement of the authorised officers is conducted independently, and that engagement is directed towards:    gathering data and information on certain situations, events, and behaviours that facilitate or contribute towards committing certain criminal acts,    strengthened and continuous physical coverage of the points, places, regions and certain areas where particular criminal acts are frequently committed, or their performance can be expected. The task is realised through the foot-patrol police service and through establishing of mobile preventive patrols, composed in accordance with the needs, from the Police and Crime Police. The preventive activity for the purpose of suppression murder and similar crimes with elements of violence is executed by undertaking preventive measures and activities aiming at protection of the physical integrity, the life of the citizens and their personal safety, with simultaneous identification of the threats that can expose them to risks. These activities are basically comprised of the following:    Direct research of the etymology of the violent behaviour (which reasons produce its creation and origin: disturbed mutual relations, threats, endangered children’s social safety due to family problems,  alcoholism, psychopathic manifestations, etc.),    Initiation and mobilisation of all social subjects and institutions in order to solve all the issues regarding the protection of life and bodily integrity, and etc.  The preventive activities for the purpose of suppression of commercial crime are undertaken in the following directions:   Research of the visible patterns and establishing of preventive measures that need to be applied,   Analysis of the results from the undertaken measures, consideration of further measures based on concrete manifestation patterns of such offences and initiating other authorised subjects to undertake immediate measures to prevent such offences, etc.  The activities of the Ministry aimed at juvenile delinquency prevention are performed in accordance to a previously prepared plan, with concrete assessment of the patterns and level of inclination for delinquent behaviour, and personal character of the juvenile or juvenile group. The following activities are undertaken on the basis of such organisation:   Adequate notification and initiation of the guardianship bodies in order to undertake measures to remove the reasons for delinquent behaviour, as well as mutual cooperation between these bodies and the police,    Establishing of a group comprised of representatives from the tutorial  body and experts from the police for the purpose of data and information exchange regarding the possibilities and the methods for juvenile delinquency prevention etc.  The preventive activity in the field of the traffic is carried out through:   Supervision over the implementation of the regulations and undertaking preventive measures for greater safety of all the participants in the traffic,    Monitoring the traffic conditions, particularly the safety of the road traffic in view of recognising determinative reasons and factors, and accordingly co-ordinated the activities of the police, etc.    The activities to prevent the organised crime include undertaking of systematic and planned measures to:    find out the patterns of committing organised crime acts and how these patterns are manifested in the targeted areas,   defining and recognising the indicators that individually or mutually identifie the criminal acts of organised crime and their perpetrators, etc.  Within the framework of its activity, the Ministry of the Interior performs training of the Police in compliance with the recommendations of the Council of Europe and other international institutions, for the purpose of finding out respective legal mechanisms that will enable the Ministry to execute its duties and authorities while providing protection and respect for the fundamental human rights and freedoms. The training is carried out in the Police Academy.  Pursuant to Article 18 of the Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 3/04; see 24_Annex_05), the police is organised in accordance with the principles of community policing which enables police-public relations, and thus, efficient co-operation with other bodies, local self-government units, non-governmental organisations and citizens.  Following the signing of the Ohrid Framework Agreement (August, 2001), within the framework of the Ministry of the Interior, a training for police personnel has been organised. This training has been carried out through seminars on the topic - Human Rights and the Police, and Police duties in the Democratic Society, supported by OSCE and the Helsinki Committee for Human Rights, where 4500 members of the Police and Crime Police have been trained, and a training of additional 1500 members is foreseen.  A total of 2100 police officers are, thus far, educated in the seminars for Community Outreach carried out by the Ministry of the Interior and the OSCE mission. There are 46 advisory groups established and 32 co-ordinators trained for communication with the local self-government.  The created National Programme for Suppression of Drug Abuse and Illicit Drug Trafficking (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 35/96) includes the following activities:    Drug prevention, including activities for carrying out seminars regarding the damaging effects of drug abuse,     Preventive control of the manufacture process in the pharmaceutical industries by timely preparation of data for manufacturing and trade with narcotics,     Within the scope of their activities, the ministry of the interior, the ministry of health, the ministry of education, the ministry of finance - the customs service, mass media, as well as part of the non-governmental organisations have particular duties. The Ministry of the Interior performs repressive prevention, and undertake activities for reducing the availability of drugs and psychotropic substances on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as out of the borders (through international police co-operation).   Within the framework of the repressive prevention, the Ministry undertakes activities for prevention - severing the international channels for illicit drug trade, arresting the perpetrators and obtaining proof of their involvement in such illicit activities.     Referring persons caught abusing drugs to the Centres for Social Welfare or other adequate institutions. In the past period, in the area of juvenile delinquency prevention, the Ministry of the Interior together with international and non-governmental organisations undertake numerous activities in the field of education of the personnel working in this area. In particular, education has been provided regarding the mode for work with juvenile perpetrators of criminal offences and children - victims of all the types of violence, especially sexual abuse, as well as family violence and trafficking with children.  For that purposes the following seminars and workshops have been carried out:   In the period from 24-26.09.2003, “Developing a Public Policy for Implementation of the Legal System for Juveniles”, supported by USAID and ISC ,   In the period from 15-16.11.2003: “Family Violence”, supported by FOSIM   In the period from 30.05.to 02.06  “Balkan bridge for drug prevention”   In the period from 17 - 19.04. 2003, “Trafficking in Human Beings”, supported by the USA Department of Justice, ICITAP, OPDAT and OSCE.   In the period from 05.09.12.2001 a seminar supported by UNICEF was carried out in Dojran on the topic First Seminar for Training in the Field of Juvenile Delinquency. Training in the field of fight against trafficking in human beings was organised in October 2003, by the Ministry of the Interior in co-operation with the OSCE and IOM, where total of 650 personnel were trained.  Within the framework of the training, the project ”REFLEX” aimed at training of professionals for preventing illegal transit, smuggling and trafficking in human beings, was carried out.   Within the framework of the project “REFLEX”, the British model for data analysis, the duties of the undercover agents, their records and bases for information gathering was presented at the course held in Britain in February 2004. During the 2004, three workshops on the topic Trafficking in Human Beings were carried out by Agencies within the US Department of Justice in the USA Embassy. These workshops were organised through International Program for support and training in criminal investigations (ICITAP) and the Program for Support, Development and Training of the Office of Public Prosecutors (OPDAT) and in co-operation with the OSCE mission in Macedonia.  Within the framework of the project “Counter trafficking - technical cooperation/capacity-building”, supported by the Government of the Kingdom of Norway, during June and July 2004 the IOM have organised three consequent trainings on topic “Human Trafficking and Illegal Migration”.  Training for special investigative techniques and conducting interviews in cases of human trafficking, in organisation of the SECI Centre was carried out in Bucharest - Romania in May.   The Ministry of the Interior within the framework of the ongoing reform in the Police foresees establishing of Special Units for prevention.   The suggested competencies of these units are as follows:    Cooperation with the Office for public relations, in particular, consultations regarding certain target groups (children, youths, adults, and other specific categories);      in the field of crime prevention and traffic safety;   Violence prevention;    Drug abuse and narcotics addiction prevention;     Providing adequate safety on the roads to the schools and other institutions;    Providing pedestrians safety, and technical advices regarding banditry protection and other criminal offences and petty crimes;     Participation in the work with the media;    Cooperation with services and other institutions that are involved in the field of prevention;     Participation in the preparation of concepts for concrete project proposals and measures; and     Other activities in the field of public security and enabling their implementation. 
17. Which cooperation exists with international police co-operation bodies? How is this co-operation organised? 
The cooperation of the Ministry of the Interior with the international police cooperation bodies may be viewed from several aspects, and above all, from the viewpoint of the substantive competencies of the Ministry of the Interior. The Ministry is competent for matters related to protection of life; personal security and protection of citizen's property; protection of human rights and freedoms; protection of the constitutional order; prevention and detection of crime; maintenance of the public peace and order; traffic control; control and surveillance of the state border; stay and movement of aliens; control of arms, explosive and other hazardous substances; and etc.  Furthermore, according to the provisions of Chapter 7 (Justice and Home Affairs) of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Community, the Ministry of the Interior undertakes activities in respect of border control; visas; asylum; migration; prevention and control of illegal migration; fight against money laundering; prevention and fight against crime and other illegal activities, and; cooperation in the field of prevention and suppression of illicit drug trafficking and abuse. The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia actively cooperates with the following bodies of international police co-operation:  
National Central Bureau (NCB) INTERPOL 
In 1993, at the 62 General Assembly of INTERPOL held in Aruba, the Republic of Macedonia was admitted to membership of the International Criminal Police Organisation-INTERPOL. The Republic of Macedonia fulfils all obligations arising from its membership and complies with international standards. In that direction, the National Central Bureau-INTERPOL was established at the Sector for International Police Cooperation within the Ministry of the Interior.  Regarding its present organisational level, functionality and technical equipment, the National Central Bureau-INTERPOL Skopje represents the Republic of Macedonia as a fully-fledged member of the International Criminal Police Organisation-INTERPOL and an equal subject in the fight against any type of international crime. Under the regional CARDS project of the European Commission, the NCB - Skopje has been completely equipped with modern equipment that contributed towards more effective performance of tasks. The computer network of INTERPOL Skopje satisfies the latest world standards in terms of protection, speed, capacity, functions and provided services.  In addition, under this project, several training courses for the personnel have been organised, elaborating the technical aspects (maintenance, administration and use of technical equipment) and the user aspect (use of the services of I-24/7 INTERPOL communication system, training for use of various software like the central ASF databases of the General Secretariat, etc.). This has raised the quality level of the performed tasks in their everyday work.   Regarding communication with the INTERPOL central information system, the NCB-Skopje actively uses the central ASF databases on persons, stolen vehicles, stolen/lost travel documents and administrative documents, stolen works of art, etc., and contributes by entering data in the databases. Data search and entry, which INTERPOL-Skopje performs on daily basis, are carried out according to the generally prescribed rules and according to the legal regulations of the Republic of Macedonia, such as the Law on Personal Data Protection. In addition, the personnel of INTERPOL-Skopje actively uses all services provided by this system, such as electronic mail, which provides for information exchange between the INTERPOL Member States in closed and protected environment. The electronic mail that arrives in NCB-Skopje is monitored by an operator, which contributes to undertaking action in timely fashion, especially in emergency cases.    The access to the I-24/7 INTERPOL communication system is generally protected, both in technical terms (by using hardware protection devices, Firewall), and in terms of controling the acess of the data user. Namely, the National Officer for protection of the I-24/7 system, employed in INTERPOL Skopje and assigned to this function by the INTERPOL General Secretariat, defines users and controls the access to the system for each user individually, granting users different rights to access in correspondence to their function and tasks.    In the forthcoming period, the regional CARDS project will continue, as a result of the successful implementation of the previous project stages and the excellent cooperation between the members of the project team and employees of this NCB.  Upon donation of additional funds, there will be training organised for the personnel who will study the second official language of INTERPOL - the French language. The recommendations of INTERPOL General Secretariat are followed in the day-to-day work.                    In the context of INTERPOL standards, the NCB Skopje satisfies almost all standards. INTERPOL Skopje operates in two shifts (8:00 - 22:00 ), and for the rest of the time, in working days and during weekends and holidays there is a duty officer who, if necessary is able to intervene immediately.  The telephone line on which the duty officer may be always contacted, is permanently in function and is published at the official INTERPOL internet web site (where all other data on this NCB may be found, as well as on other INTERPOL members ).  The promptness in acting upon requests, which are delivered to INTERPOL Skopje by law enforcing agencies and institutions in the Republic of Macedonia, and by other INTERPOL members, depends largely on the communication and cooperation with them and their speed in acting upon requests for checks forwarded by INTERPOL Skopje in resolving cases. Taking into consideration the nature of the criminal activities and their regional inter-connection, the NCB of the Republic of Macedonia most closely cooperates with the neighbouring countries and countries of the Balkan region, and then with INTERPOL member states from ZONE 2, which encompasses the European countries.  
EUROPOL 
Under the Decision of the EU Council for Justice and Home Affairs, dated 27 March 2000, the EUROPOL Directorate was authorised to begin negotiations for conclusion of Agreement on Cooperation with 23 EU non-member states and 3 bodies outside the EU. On 13.06.2002, this Decision of the EU Council, was supplemented with the authorisation to start the procedure with five new states, the Republic of Macedonia being one of them. On 15 and 16 of October, 2004, in the context of the preparations for the official negotiations, EUROPOL organised the second initial seminar, for the five states, where the Questionnaire for evaluation of capabilities for participation in EUROPOL were presented. The answers to the questionnaire, based on existing national legislation have already been delivered to EUROPOL. After the ratification of the Council of Europe Convention for Protection of Individuals with Regard to the Automatic Processing of Personal Data, No. 108, from 28.01.1981, and the adoption of the new Law on Data Protection in conformity with the relevant EU legislation, the necessary formal pre-conditions for signing the Agreement on Cooperation with EUROPOL are fulfilled.  In 2003, on the basis of the amendments in the systematisation of positions at the Ministry of the Interior, the Sector for International Police Cooperation was established, where one of the positions is foreseen for EUROPOL liaison officer. The job description will be defined after the signing of the Agreement with EUROPOL.  
SECI Regional Centre for Combat against Trans-border Crime  
The Republic of Macedonia is one of the initiators of the idea for establishing a SECI Centre. Hence, in 2000, it ratified the Agreement on Cooperation, which is the basic legal act of the Centre. Starting with 2001, Liaison Officers from the Customs and Police have been appointed for work in the SECI Centre. At the same time, at the Sector for International Police Cooperation in the Ministry of the Interior there is a national focal office where a SECI liaison officer acts upon requests from the SECI Centre. The liaison officers that are assigned in the SECI Centre participate in the information exchange, and facilitate the preparation of regional operations and implementation of various projects.     The Ministry of the Interior actively participates in large number of operative activities of the SECI Centre, and according to the results, the Republic of Macedonia is one of the most successful states in the region. More characteristic cases initiated or realised by the Ministry of the Interior are the following: securing the presence of witnesses-victims of trafficking in human beings for court proceedings in Macedonia; organising  operative meetings between the representatives of the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Albania regarding cases of kidnapping of Macedonian citizens; identification of victims of murders committed in Macedonia related to trafficking in human beings; delivering operative information in cases of kidnapped Macedonian citizens, etc.    The Republic of Macedonia is a regional coordinator of the SECI Working Group for financial and computer crime. In this respect, the Republic of Macedonia fulfilled the obligation to establish Regional Clearing House for analyses of financial crime data, where experts from the Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry of Finance, the Customs Administration, the Public Prosecutor’s Office and other institutions have working meetings. For purposes of prevention and suppression of crime in the Region, the Ministry of the Interior is actively involved in the work of the following working groups: Working Group on Terrorism, Working Group on Stolen Vehicles, Working Group for Prevention of Smuggling and Frauds, Working Group for Suppression of Trafficking in Human Beings, and Working Group for Suppression of Drug Trafficking. Similarly, in the framework of the Centre, the Republic of Macedonia was the initiator of the first regional action for suppression of cases of illegal drug trade, initiator for drafting regional witness protection program, initiator of the regional action for suppression of illegal migration, etc. According to the number of instituted requests and information exchange, the Republic of Macedonia is ranked third among countries having Liaison Officers for the SECI Centre.  
18. Which international instruments regarding police are adhered to and implemented (Council of Europe, UN, INTERPOL Convention etc.) 
The Republic of Macedonia, as a member-state of the United Nations and of the Council of Europe has signed and ratified the following conventions: a) The Council of Europe Conventions 
  European Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms; (The Convention was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (signed on 14.06.1996, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 2 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, conferring upon the European Court of Human Rights competence to give advisory opinions; (The Protocol was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 3 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, amending Articles 29, 30 and 34 of the Convention; (The Protocol was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 4 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, securing certain rights and freedoms other than those already included in the Convention and in the first Protocol thereto; (The Protocol was signed on 14.06.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 5 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, amending Articles 22 and 44 of the Convention; (The Protocol was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 6 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms concerning the Abolition of the Death Penalty; (The Protocol was signed on 14.06.1996, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1997);   Protocol No. 7 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms; (The Protocol was signed on 14.06.1996, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 01.07.1997);   Protocol No. 8 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms; (The Protocol was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10. 04.1997 and entered into force on 10. 04.1997);   Protocol No. 11 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, restructuring the control machinery established thereby; (The Protocol was signed on 09.11.1995, ratified on 10.04.1997 and entered into force on 01.11.1998);   Protocol No. 12 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms; (The Protocol was signed on 04.11.2000, ratified on 13.07.2004);   Protocol No. 13 to the Convention for Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, concerning the abolition of the death penalty in all circumstances; (The Protocol was signed on 03.05.2002, ratified on 13.07.2004 and entered into force on 01.05.2004).   European Convention for Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment and Protocol No. 1 and Protocol No. 2 to the Convention (the Convention and the Protocols were signed on 14.06.1996, were ratified on 06.06.1997 and entered into force on 01.10.1997 – the Convention, and 01.03. 2003 – the Protocols);   European Convention on Nationality (the Convention was signed on 06.11.1997, ratified on 03.06.2003, and entered into force on 01.10.20030;    European Convention on Exercise of Children's Rights (signed on 03.04.2001, ratified on 15.01.2003, enters into force on 01.05. 2003);   European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters, with additional protocol; (the Convention and the Protocol were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1997 and entered into force 26.10.1999);   Convention on Cyber crime (the Convention was signed on 23.11.2001, ratified on 15.09..2004, and entered into force 01.01.20050;   European Convention on Extradition with additional Protocol No. 1 and Protocol No. 2 to the Convention (the Convention and the Protocols were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07. 1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999);   Convention on Transfer of Sentenced Persons with additional Protocol to the Convention (the Convention and the Protocols were signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999);   Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (the Convention was signed on 06.06.2002, ratified on 21.11.2002 and entered into force 01.11. 2003);   Additional Protocol to the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption, signed on 15.05.2003;   Civil Law Convention on Corruption (signed on 08.06.2000; ratified on 29.11.2002, and entered into force on 01.11.2003);   Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of Proceeds from Crime; (the Convention was signed on 14.12.1999, ratified on 19.05.2000 and entered into force 01.09.2000);   Agreement on the Multinational Peace Force South-Eastern Europe with additional Protocol (the Agreement was concluded on 26.09.1998, and the additional protocol was concluded on 12.01.1999);   European Convention on International Effects of Deprivation of the Right to Drive a Motor Vehicle (the Convention was acceded to by succession on 30.03.1994, entered into force on 01.07.1994);   European Convention on Spectator Violence and Misbehaviour at Sports Events and in particular at Football Matches (the Convention was acceded to by succession on 30.03.1994 and,entered into force on 01.05.1994);   European Convention on the Suppression of Terrorism (the Convention was signed on 08.11.2001, and ratified on 29.11.2004, and entered into force 01.03.2004);   Protocol amending the European Convention on the Suppression of Terrorism (signed on 15.05.2003);    European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters; (the Convention was signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999, and entered into force on 26.10.1999);   Additional Protocol to the European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters; (the Protocol was signed on 28.07.1999, ratified on 28.07.1999); 
b) UN Conventions 
  Universal Declaration of Human Rights, adopted on 10.12.1948;   International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, adopted on 19.12.1966 (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, International Agreements - 7/71-73);   International Convention for Suppression of Terrorist Bombings (the Convention was signed on 16.12.1998, ratified on 06.05.2004);   International Convention for Suppression of Financing of Terrorism (the Convention was signed on 31.01.2000, ratified on 06.05.2004);   Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Seizure of Aircraft (from 07.01.1998, acceded to by succession);    Convention on Offences and Certain Other Acts Committed on Board Aircraft (from 30.08.1994, acceded to by succession);   Convention on Physical Protection of Nuclear Material (from 20.09.1996, acceded to by succession);   Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Acts against Safety of Civil Aviation (from 04.01.1995, acceded to by succession)   Protocol for Suppression of Unlawful Acts of Violence at Airports Serving International Civil Aviation, Supplementary to the Convention for Suppression of Unlawful Acts against Safety of Civil Aviation (from 04.01.1995, acceded to by succession);   Convention on Marking of Plastic Explosives for Purpose of Detection (from 21.09.1998, acceded to by succession);    Convention on Prevention and Punishment of Crimes against Internationally Protected Persons, Including Diplomatic Agents (signed on 29.01.1989, entered into force 17.12.1991);   Convention on Safety of United Nations and Associated Personnel (the Convention was signed on 06.03.2002, the ratification procedure is under way);   Convention of Slavery (entered into force on 17.11.1991, acceded to by succession on 18.01.1994);   Supplementary Convention on Abolition of Slavery, Slave Trade, and Institutions and Practices Similar to Slavery (entered into force 17.11.1991, acceded to by succession on 18.01.1994);   Convention for Suppression of Trafficing in Persons and Exploitation of Prostitution of Others, adopted on 21.03.1950 (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, International Agreements - 2/51-39). The Convention was acceded to by succession;   Convention regulating the Status of Persons with Double Nationality (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, International Agreements, 15/56-22). The Convention was acceded to by succession;   Convention relating to the Status of Stateless Persons – adopted on 29.09.1954 (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, International Agreements - 8/59-64). The Convention was acceded to by succession;   Protocol relating to a Certain Case of Statelessness adopted on 12.04.1930 (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, International Agreements, 7/60-69). The Protocol was acceded to on the basis of succession;   Convention relating to the Status of Refugees, adopted on 28.08.1951;   Protocol relating to the Status of Refugees, adopted on 31.01.967 (the Convention and the Protocols are acceded to by succession, and the Republic of Macedonia ratified them in 1994);   International Convention Against Taking of Hostages (entered into force 17.11.1991, acceded to by succession on 12.03.1998);   United Nations Convention against Transnational Organised Crime (from 15.11.2000);    Additional Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, Especially Women and Children;   Additional Protocol Against Smuggling of Migrants by Land, Sea and Air (the Convention and the Protocols were signed on 12.12.2000 and ratified on 28.09.2004). In October 1993 the Republic of Macedonia has acceded, on the basis of succession, to the following conventions:   Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs from 1961, amended by Protocol from 1972;    Convention on Psychotropic Substances from 1971;    Convention against Traffic in Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances from 1988.  The ratification of the conventions represents an obligation for the Republic of Macedonia to implement them and to harmonise the national legislation accordingly.  c) INTERPOL 
On the 62 INTERPOL General Assembly session, which took place in Aruba, in 1993 the Republic of Macedonia acceded to membership of the International Criminal Police Organisation - INTERPOL. The Republic of Macedonia fulfils all obligations based on the membership in this organisation, and respects the statutory norms and set standards in this context. In accordance to them, a Section of NCB INTERPOL was established within the Sector for International Police Cooperation within the Ministry of the Interior. 19. What is your capacity to participate in Europol? 
Undertaking activities for approximation of the national legislation to the acquis of the EU, the Republic of Macedonia has expressed its willingness for cooperation with the Europol, and submitted answers to the questionnaires within that context, on the basis of which the Europol can perform an assessment of the conditions for signing of an agreement with the Republic of Macedonia.  The answers to the questionnaires were given on the basis of the then valid legislation of the Republic of Macedonia, whereby, taking into consideration the process of its approximation with the EU acquis, special attention was paid to the issues relating to protection of personal data, as one of the prerequisites for starting negotiations with Europol. With the recent ratification of the Convention for Protection of Individuals with regard to Automatic Processing of Personal Data, and with the adoption of the Law on Data Protection, the necessary legislative framework was created and harmonised with the EU acquis on protection of personal data. Hence, the conditions for starting negotiations with the Europol for signing an agreement are met.   In parallel, within the Strategy for Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03), activities for strengthening the capacities for cooperation with the Europol are implemented.  In 2003, on basis of the change in the systematisation within the Ministry of the Interior, a Sector for International Police Cooperation was established. This sector performs its tasks on the basis of the positive legislation of the Republic of Macedonia in the field of criminal law, the conventions signed and ratified by our country, and with respect of the international standards. A post for the Europol liaison officer will be established within the Sector. The job description will be defined, and the post will be filled after the signing of the agreement with Europol.  From a technical viewpoint, considering that the Sector for International Police Cooperation has experience in networking and maintenance of the information systems of INTERPOL and SECI Centre and is in possession of a modern technical equipment (donated by the European Commission and through SECI from Germany), which meets the modern standards of functionality and protection, the networking within the information system of Europol can be carried out immediately after the agreement is signed. With regards to the human resources in general, the Ministry of the Interior has professional staff to implement the forms of police cooperation, meeting the required standards regarding the general (mandatory) and the additional prerequisites.  20. What information tools exist and are used (databases (owner, content, access); data registers, on-line sources etc.)? 
Since 1969, the Ministry of the Interior has a centralised information system based on IBM technology, which has been upgraded several times in the past period.  The Ministry has its computer network to which all local organisational units are connected, as well as most of the border crossing points. The application software of the information system has been developed independently by the Ministry’s staff, the largest part of which has been developed using the programming tool PL/1, Visual Age Generator and Lotus Notes. The fundamental base is the IBM DB/2 base, and in certain applications the ORACL base is also used. In respect of specific requirements, the following tools are also used: Microsoft Word, Excel, Access and Analyst Notebook. The information system of the Ministry of the Interior consists of the following sub-systems:  a) The sub-system on public security, which includes the following operative-criminal registers: 
  Register of crimes and their perpetrators - contains records of all committed crimes under the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as crimes and their perpetrators according to other laws containing provisions on criminal liability;   Register of general alphabetical index – contains data from the operative records of perpetrators of crimes and more serious violations of the public order, imposed penalties, nicknames, aliases, and skills;   Register of aliens – contains data on aliens with permanent residence and aliens with temporary residence in the Republic of Macedonia, aliens with recognised refugee status, aliens who have been granted asylum on grounds of humanitarian protection, and aliens who have a ban on entry in the Republic of Macedonia.   
b) The sub-system of administrative affairs includes the following registers created in the course of administrative procedure at the Ministry of the Interior:    Register of personal identification number of the citizens – contains records for all live and deceased citizens of the Republic of Macedonia;   Records of the Registers of Birth and Deaths – contains data from the Registers of Births and Deaths of the Republic of Macedonia;   Register of nationals – contains data on all persons who are nationals of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as on nationals released from the nationality of the Republic of Macedonia;    Register of travel documents – contains data on issued travel documents, lost and missing Macedonian travel documents, and bans on issuance of travel documents to nationals of the Republic of Macedonia;   Register of vehicles – contains data on all types of motor and coupled vehicles with engine power over 50 cm3, and their owners;    Register of driving licences – contains data on drivers of motor vehicles and imposed limitations;    Register of Firearms - contains dtata on light firearms and their owners;    Register of traffic accidents – contains data on more serious traffic accidents and the persons involved;   Register of fires – contains data on fires occurring on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia.  
c) The sub-system of common affairs includes the following registers of interest for the work of the Ministry of the Interior:    Register of employees – contains data on the employees at the Ministry of the Interior;   Register of material and financial operations - contains data on the material and financial transactions of the Ministry of the Interior and salaries of the employees. 
d) The sub-system of statistical reports includes regular and specific statistical reports, such as:  
  Statistical report on criminality – contains statistical reports on committed crimes, consequences and their perpetrators;    Statistical report on traffic accidents – contains statistical reports on committed traffic accidents, their causes and consequences;    Statistical report on fires – contains statistical reports on fires, their causes and consequences;   Specific statistical reports – contain statistics reports from all the registers kept in electronic form.  All aforementioned sub-systems are linked and make the central information system of the Ministry of the Interior.  Along with the development of the central information system, the Ministry is also developing information sub-system of the local computer network.   This sub-system contains the following registers:    Register of searches and notices on persons – contains records of wanted persons;   Register of stolen motor vehicles – contains data on stolen motor vehicles on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia;    System for automated processing of fingerprints;   Register of procurement and transport of explosives and firearms – contains data on approved and performed procurements and transport of explosive materials, firearms and ammunition;    Register of seized drugs - contains data on seizures of drugs on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia;   Register of forensic expertises – contains data for all types of expertises performed by the experts of the Ministry of the Interior;   Register of state border crossing – contains data on persons and vehicles crossing the state border of Republic of Macedonia. The databases are stored in a centralised manner, and the Ministry has a sector dealing with data security and accessibility. The owner of the databases is the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. the organisational unit that has created the database.  Access to data is restricted, and depends on the type of the authorisation that the organisational unit has. Access permission is given by the organisational unit that has created the database.   On line data sources are: the administrative services of the Ministry of the Interior where the applications for institution of administrative procedure are submitted, the units that process the central warrants and register aliens on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, duty operative centres where all events of interest in terms of security are registered, and the analysis services that elaborate the crimes and misdemeanours.  21. What information equipment is used (fax, phone, radio communication, beepers, pagers, data networks, etc.)? 
The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia uses the following devices as information transfer equipment:  telephones, fax machines, computers and radio stations.  All these terminal devices make up the telecommunication systems of the Ministry.  
1. Integrated digital network for voice and data transfer This system consists of 52 communication nodes, which connect the larger organisational units at the Ministry (Sectors of Internal Affairs and Sections of Internal Affairs) and border crossing points in the Republic of Macedonia. The communication nodes are of NET Promina 800 series type. These nodes are connected in a mixed structure (star and ring), and have 2b/s links. These communication nodes integrate voice and data. The communication nodes are digital telecommunication devices with different type of access interfaces that provide transfer of digital and analogue signals, data for various types of terminal computer systems, inter-connection of computer networks, transmission of pictures, video, ISDN and access to Internet. 1.1. Telephone system The telephone system is closed, autonomous and security protected. It consists of a network of 35 digital telephone switchboards with approximately 5000 connections, which are installed in all bigger organisational units of the Ministry (Sectors of Internal Affairs and Sections of Internal Affairs). The telephone switchboards are home switchboards of OMNI JTC1 and JTC3 type. They are connected via R2 digital signalisation. Other organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior use smaller analogue telephone systems that are networked in the system. In addition to transfer of voice, this system is also used for transmission of fax messages.  1.2. Data transfer  Data transfer at the Ministry of the Interior is done through the same communication nodes, which have integrated routers with CISCO software, integrated in the computer nodes through access data channels. The former are used for connecting LAN networks in WAN network, and the latter for connecting with the terminal computer systems.  All Sectors for Internal Affairs and Sections for Internal Affairs, including the border crossing points, have LAN networks installed of two types -Token Ring and Ethernet. Data transmission speed between the LAN networks ranges from 256 Kbit/s to 1Mbit/s, and the protocol TCP/IP is mostly used.  Data transfer network of the Ministry of the Interior is used to access the databases, data exchange among the organisational units of the Ministry, e-mail and Internet. This network is protected from external intrusion by two Firewall systems, Checkpoint and PIX. 2. Radio-communication systems Currently, the Ministry of the Interior uses analogue radio-communication systems, functioning in UHF and VHF frequency areas. This system, using repeaters of Storno and Motorola type, enable complete coverage of the territory of the Republic of Macedonia with radio signals. Part of the territory of Republic of Macedonia is covered with digital radio-communication equipment of the Astro-Motorola type. All peripheral devices, hand, mobile and stationary radio stations are of the Motorola type. Due to the configuration of the terrain, radio signal coverage of certain rural areas and border areas is not complete. Given the fact that existing analogue system is technologically and functionally out-dated, it is planned to introduce new digital radio system - TETRA. 22. What are the modalities of and conditions for co-operation of the police with other public security bodies (customs, security and intelligence services)? 
In accordance with the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03, and 19/04): The Ministry of the Interior, within its competencies, provides professional assistance to the citizens, enterprises and other legal entities and state bodies in fulfilling the prescribed rights and obligations and protection of life and personal security of the citizens and their assets.  The Ministry provides information, data and reports to the citizens, enterprises and other legal entities and state bodies for issues of their direct interest. In accordance with the Law on Intelligence Agency (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 19/95): The Agency co-operates with the state bodies on issues of mutual interest. In the light of realisation of the mutual co-operation, the Agency and the state bodies are obliged to provide information, data and reports to each other and to coordinate the activities that are in the competence of the Agency. The Decision of the President of the Republic of Macedonia and the President of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, DT No. 07-9 from 17.09.2003 and DT. No.66/1 from 16.09.2003 envisages regular meetings between the heads of the security services in the Republic of Macedonia for the purpose of exchange of relevant security and intelligence information.  The operations, modalities and the conditions for cooperation between the Ministry of Defence, i.e. the Military police and the Police, crime police and other bodies of the public security, as well as with the intelligence services are regulated by the Defence Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01 and 5/03), the Rules of the Military Police Service, the Instructions for: Organisation and performance of the service and duty in the Military police; Protection of foreign military delegations by Military police; Protection of high state and military persons and foreign delegations and; Organisation and performance of registration offices in the objects of the Ministry of Defence and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the Defence Law and in accordance with the efforts for compliance with the NATO and EU standards, the Ministry of Defence cooperates and exchanges information with the Ministry of the Interior and the Intelligence Agency. In this direction, and in accordance with the Strategic Defence Review of the Ministry of Defence, in determining the missions of the Army regarding its contribution to regional conflict resolution and crises, the Army cooperates with the Ministry of the Interior in the field of intelligence information; support facilities and capacities which exceed their abilities in the border security; support in the fight against terrorism, and; support in carrying out actions for protection of facilities, which are significant for the defence and support in resolving threats.  Pursuant to Article 10, point 17 and Article 21 from the Customs Administration Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), and Article 11, point 9 from the Customs Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 21/98, 63/98, 86/99, 25/00, 109/00, 31/01, 4/02, 55/02, and 42/03), the cooperation and data exchange with the state administration bodies and other state bodies is prescribed. A national focal point has been established in the Ministry of the Interior pursuant to Article 8 from the Cooperation Agreement for Prevention and Fight against Cross-border Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 16/2000), and a National Focal Point Guidebook has been drafted, which is accepted by the Council of Europe on 28.04.1997 and the political guidelines number 6-9 established by the European Council. The Customs and the Ministry of the Interior have their officers in the national focal point, who send and receive requests from the SECI centre. According to the Rulebook on Manner of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.12/98 and 15/03) in the performing of the internal affairs, the authorised official persons and other officers mutually cooperate, coordinate their activities, provide mutual professional and other help, and act in a manner that provide timely, successful and complete performance of the official duties and tasks.  Regarding the co-operation in performing state border crossing control, the Rulebook prescribes that the authorised officers in performing the activities under their responsibility cooperate with:   The border military units, the customs bodies, as well as other bodies and legal entities which perform duties at the border crossing points and in the border zone;   The captaincy, the border military units, and other bodies and legal entities that perform tasks of inspection and control of the lakes;   The customs bodies, the aviation control administration, the Airport Services Enterprise and other bodies and legal entities that  perform duties at the airport;  The National Strategy for Integrated Border Management foresees that:    All bodies included in the integrated border management are to provide “administrative assistance”- a legal principle, according to which, any state body can request from other state body administrative assistance if due to certain circumstances or legal impediments, it is not in position to perform its legal duty.   A Memorandum of Co-operation between the Customs Administration and the Border Police was signed, contributing towards the development and harmonisation of the procedures for coordination between these two bodies;   A creation and implementation of Standard Operational Procedures based on determined competencies of the Border Police and the Customs Administration:   A Memorandum of Cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration and the Bureau for Medications should be signed that will contribute for development of mutual cooperation based on the Strategy for Investigations related to drugs. In accordance with the Document Specific Action Oriented Measures against Organised Crime, adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia on 10.11.2003, a Sector for Criminal and Intelligence Analysis was established within the Department for Organised Crime. The gathering, verification and assessment of the operational information and data, and their analysis are within the competencies of this Sector. The analytical information acquired in this way, enables the performance of appropriate police actions.    This Sector will provide support to the inter-institutional cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry of Finance and the Customs Administration through appointment of Liaison Officers and operational connection of the data bases of these institutions. It will perform the activities of a National Centre for gathering, analysis and exchange of information related to crime, in order to increase the efficiency in the fight against organised crime. A Memorandum of Cooperation for Prevention of Organised Crime and Other Types of Crime was concluded between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance and on the basis of the Memorandum, a protocol was concluded between the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration. Protocols with the Financial Police and the Directorate for Prevedntion of Money Laundering are to be signed.   23. What statistical data exist (police activities, crime, prevention, repression)? Please provide details about the methods and quality of these statistical data. How are statistics used to guide policy development? 
The Ministry of the Interior systematically collects information on security related events, criminal and other illegal activities, and on the measures undertaken by the police to maintain security. There are statistical data on all types of criminal offences and on their perpetrators, on public order violations, traffic violations, on misdemeanours in perpetrating other illegal activities, on traffic accidents, on all types of fires, on suicides, accidents, movement of nationals and foreign citizens and vehicles across the state border, data on the number of motor vehicles and the road network in the Republic of Macedonia, data on seized drugs and weapons, on the residence and movement of foreign citizens in the country, and on other activities undertaken by the police according to their legal competencies, or upon request of another authorised institution.  Most of these data are processed and entered into the central information system of the Ministry for further. The processed data are intended for the needs of the various organisational units at the Ministry. The statistical data processed in the central information system are presented annually and for periods of three, six and nine months. In connection with specific ongoing needs and operative monitoring of current security related developments, part of the data are processed on personal computers and manually, and summaries in table format, reviews etc., are being prepared, in which respect the data are processed for shorter periods as well (monthly). The processed statistical data enables establishing of scope of security related developments, their territorial coverage and presence, dynamics and trends in the country.  The processed statistical data are used for preparing information on specific problems, analytical reviews, summaries and other documents that facilitate monitoring of the security situation in the country, trends of crime and other illegal activities, assessment of the effectiveness of the police in the past period and  determination of the direction for future activities.  Monthly statistical data are used for operative planning of the daily police activities, while quarterly data are used for tactical planning, and annual statistical data are used for strategic planning.   The quality of statistical data processed in the central information system coupled with other manually processed statistical data is satisfactory and facilitates operative, tactical and strategic planning and determining the direction of the police security system in the Republic of Macedonia.  24. Are there national statistical instruments for measuring the crime rate and the clear-up rate? Please provide the relevant statistics for the last two or three years. 
Within the framework of its function, the Ministry of the Interior continuously records all data related to criminal charges for committed criminal offences on the territory of the entire country. The data from the criminal charges submitted to the Public Prosecutor’s Office are entered in appropriate software of the central computer system in the Ministry of the Interior. This system works according to IBM technology, and part of the data are processed on special forms, KRIM-1 and KRIM-2, which are entered in the information system, as well. The additional processing of data results in preparation of statistical data (quarterly, semi-annual, three-quarterly and annually), regarding the crime on the entire territory of the country. On the basis of these data the crime rate is calculated i.e. the ratio of the total number of criminal offences to a population of 100.000 citizens of the Republic of Macedonia. The crime cleared-up rate presents the percentage of cleared up criminal offences in relation to the total number of reported criminal offences by an unknown perpetrator.  Both, the crime cleared up rate and the crime rate are presented in all statistic reports which are prepared by the Ministry of the Interior and delivered to the state bodies and institutions in the Republic of Macedonia, as well as, upon a request, to international institutions, INTERPOL and the media.   The data regarding the total number of registered criminal offences on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia are presented in the following chart, as well as registered criminal offences according to the area of crime, which is established according to the nomenclature of the Ministry of the Interior, and certain more specific criminal offences registered in the past two years. For all these criminal offences, the ratio of the crime rate to the population of 100.000 is calculated, as well as the rate of  clear-up cases in the area of classical crime during the reporting year and the total number of reported offenders which are detected as perpetrators of the crimes. 
Total registered criminal offences 
2002 2003 
TYPES  OF CRIMINALITY total registered criminal offences crime rate  to the population of 100 000 citizens rate of solved cases % reported perpetrators TOTAL total registered criminal offences crime rate to the population of 100 000 citizens rate of solved cases % reported perpetrators TOTAL  18.308 898,3 15.651 22.547 1105 20.313 Criminal offences in the area of  commercial crime 756 37,1    954 1.663 81,5    2.148 Criminal offences in the area of  organised crime 222 10,9    311 222 10,9    271 Criminal offences in the area of illegal trade 487 23,9    633 644 31,5    780 Criminal offences in the area of classical crime 16.843 826,4 55,1 13.753 20.018 980,8  58,2 17.114 More specific criminal offences Murder 61 67,2 45 73 3,6 76,7 72 Rape 36 1,7 97,2 40 56 2,7 92,9 62 Aggravated theft 8.370 411 41,8 6.229 9.128 447,2 41,4 6.811 Banditry 447 21,9 38,9 336 548 26,8 44,2 478 Act of violence 95 4,6 95,8 231 109 5,3 93,6 217 Misuse of official position 178 8,7   221 854 41,8   1.130 Smuggling 53 2,6 58 19 0,9 29 Illegal drug trade 282 13,8 378 406 19,9 517 Illegal arms trade 153 7,5 215 213 10,4 238 Source: Ministry of the Interior   25. Are performance indicators or benchmarks available to assess the quality of police activities? In the absence of such data, how is police performance evaluated? 
Data pointing out to the quality of police activities are statistical data pertaining to the resolved crimes and misdemeanours with unknown perpetrators in a certain period of time, in relation to the total number of registered crims with unknown perpetrators per 100,000 inhabitants. Statistical data are processed for a time period of 3, 6, and 9 months, and annually. The statistical data are compared with data from previous years, and with statistical data of the police in neighbouring countries. Likewise, information regarding concrete security phenomena and events are produced, as well as regarding the police activities and the effect of police performance.  Pursuant to the Rulebook on Organisation and Systematisation of Jobs at the Ministry of the Interior data analysis and data processing is done by the Sector for Analyses and Research. In accordance with the Action Plan for Strategy Reform, a Section for Control of the Quality of Work  is established within the Department for Organised Crime.  One of the basic functions of this Section will be development of appropriate quality standards which will be the basis for assessment of the legal and technical aspects of the investigations quality.  26. What are the tools for career development? How is the performance of the individual police officer assessed? 
The career advancement at the Ministry of the Interior is regulated by the following by-laws: Rulebook on the Systematisation of Jobs at the Ministry of the Interior; Instructions on the Manner and Procedure for Internal Job Announcements at the Ministry of the Interior; and the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. The Rulebook on the Systematisation of Jobs at the Ministry of the Interior establishes the positions, as well as the criteria which must be fulfilled by employees of the Ministry to be eligible for a given position, while the Personnel Service, i.e. the human resources service, is responsible for all employment procedures, assignments, promotions and termination of employment, as well as exercise of employment related rights. The Service keeps complete records of the necessary data on the employees.  A police officer can use the opportunity to advance in the career by submitting an application under the procedure for internal job announcements at the Ministry of the Interior. The manner and procedure for internal job announcements for selection of employees for positions with special duties and authorities at the Ministry of the Interior are prescribed by the Instruction on the Manner and Procedure for Internal Job Announcements at the Ministry of the Interior. Pursuant to the provisions of the aforementioned Instruction, the internal announcements at the Ministry of the Interior are published by sending a telegram to all organisational units within the Ministry. The telegram contains data i.e. description of the available job which is to be filled upon the internal job announcement, the special conditions to be fulfilled for the concerned job in accordance to the Rulebook on the Systematisation of Jobs and the deadline for submission of the applications.  The Instruction, in the same time specifies the data which the application must contain, determining that the application is to contain a brief curriculum vitae of the candidate, that, inter alia, must have data on: the working experience and career development at the Ministry of the Interior; additional education; awards and sanctions; data whether a procedure for violation of working discipline has been instituted against the candidate, and its outcome, if any; participation in courses and seminars and; foreign languages and computer skills.  In order that every employee at the Ministry has the opportunity to submit an application for the internal job announcement, the aforementioned Instruction prescribes an obligation for the heads of all organisational units within the Ministry to inform all employees in the organisational unit about the contents of the telegram by which the internal job announcement is published. The procedure upon the internal announcement is carried out by a committee established by a decision of the Minister of the Interior. The Committee consists of a Chairperson and four members, as well as their deputies. The Chairperson and the three members, one of whom is a representative of the Macedonian Police Trade Union, are permanent members of the committee and are elected for a period of one year, and the fifth member of the committee is a non-permanent member and this is the head of the organisational unit in which the job is available or vacated, and has the mandate to perform only the procedure for that particular job. Depending on the requirements for the concerned job, the Committee may also include an external member from the Police Academy.  The Committee is obliged, within shortest possible time, but not later than 30 days from the expiry of the deadline for submission of applications, to carry out the procedure upon the internal job announcement. After the completion of the selection procedure, within 2 days from the date of completion of the procedure, the Committee is obliged to submit a written proposal to the Minister of the Interior to adopt a decision on the job assignment. The written proposal, which the Committee submits to the Minister, contains a list of five most successful candidates and a report on the implemented procedure. For purposes of objective establishment of the candidate list, and depending on the type of tasks for the concerned position, the Committee may conduct interviews with the candidates, as well as psychology tests, assessment of physical shape, examination of knowledge of laws and by-laws needed to perform the relevant tasks, and may examine the foreign language proficiency, etc. In addition to the aforementioned activities, when establishing the list of the most successful candidates, the Committee also takes into account the acquired certificates from seminars and courses in which the applicant participated, the analytical review of the organisation and the methods of work for the concerned job presented by the candidate and, proficiency in foreign languages and/or computers, etc. If necessary, the Committee may request a reference from the immediate superior of the candidate. Based on the proposed list of five most successful candidates, prepared by the Committee, the Minister of the Interior, by a Decision on Assignment, decides on the selection of the employee for the position for which the internal job announcement procedure was implemented. The work of police officers is continually assessed by heads of organisational units. The Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/98, 11/98, 12/00, 3/03 and 3/04) explicitly prescribes an obligation for the head of the organisational unit to make monthly analysis of the work of the organisational unit and of every employee and at the same time to establish whether the concerned employee has fulfilled the job performance average. If it has been established that the employee has performed above the average, and/or has performed the work with particular success, the head of the organisational unit where the employee works may propose a salary increase for the current month. Salary increase, according to the provisions of the Collective Agreement, will be granted especially in the following cases:   Exceptional diligence and quality in the work and performance of assigned tasks,   Demonstrated initiative in the work, such as giving useful proposals and solutions contributing to better results in the work,   Performance of more comprehensive activities and tasks, as compared with the regular  activities and tasks,   Demonstrated exceptional professionalism and expertise in application of legislation and other regulations,   Significant contribution to prevention of crime and of other unlawful activities,   Performance of activities and tasks in cases when an individual needs to take a decision, which contributes to the promotion of reputation of the Ministry,   Successful performance of activities and tasks of an absent officer, over a longer period,   Participation with particular success in the performance of group, individual, local or nation wide actions. If the head of the organisational unit where the officer works establishes that the officer has performed bellow the average of the expected job performance results, they can propose a salary reduction for the current month. In accordance with the provisions of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, a salary reduction for the current month shall be determined particularly in the following cases:   Insufficient diligence in performance of activities and tasks,   Performance of activities and tasks without the required quality and as programmed, planned or required in the order that has been issued,   Non-performance of activities and tasks within the specified deadlines,   Demonstrated insufficient expertise and professionalism in the application of the legislation and other regulations,   Inefficient utilisation of working hours, and   Improper conduct towards co-workers or third persons and causing justified reactions and objections, which is negatively reflected on the performance of the tasks. When establishing the existence of the aforementioned cases, their scope, gravity and consequences for the performance of the specific job and for the organisational unit as a whole are also assessed. The proposal by the head of the organisational unit for salary increase or reduction is submitted to the organisational unit of the Ministry in charge of personnel issues, which reviews the proposal and gives an opinion on proposal’s conformity to the criteria established under the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. If it is established that the proposal is based on the prescribed criteria, an opinion is requested from the relevant organisational unit at the headquarters of the Ministry, which supervises the performance of the tasks in the given area. After the opinion of the concerned organisational unit is received, the proposal is submitted to the Undersecretary and the Director of the Directorate for their agreement and specific proposals for adoption of the decision.  If the head of the organisational unit establishes that the employee has achieved unsatisfactory results in the work, they can institute a procedure for establishing of poor job performance results, which is envisaged by the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior. The procedure starts with preparation of a report by the head of the organisational unit, which contains the following data: given and family name; job description and organisational unit in which the employee works; period of work which is assessed; brief description of the task which has not been fulfilled or has been unsatisfactorily performed; when and who has given the orders to the officer; whether in the course of work appropriate instructions, guidelines and warnings have been given; the consequences from such job performance and; brief assessment of the employee for the preceding three months. At the same time, the employee is given written notice about their current job performance, with a warning to improve the work in the following month. If the employee does not improve the work within 30 days from the day of the warning, and there are no justified reasons for such job performance, a written and explained proposal for institution of a procedure for determination of responsibility is prepared. The proposal is forwarded to the employee, who should immediately present a written explanation of the reasons for poor job performance. At the same time, the proposal is forwarded to the branch of the Trade Union in the respective organisational unit, anda written opinion is requested, which the Trade Union has the duty to provide within 3 days; alternatively, the representative of the Trade Union would present the opinion at the hearing before the dismissal committee. The procedure for establishment of poor job performance results is conducted by the Dismissal Committee at the Ministry of the Interior which establishes the responsibility of the employee and which prepares a written proposal to the Minister for adoption of relevant ruling. If the committee establishes that the employee is not responsible or that the conditions to adopt a ruling on dismissal from job are not met, it proposes to the Minister to reject the proposal, i.e., to terminate the procedure. Depending on the degree of responsibility of the employee, the conditions under which the violation has been made, the previous job performance and conduct of the employee, the Minister can adopt a ruling for dismissal or replace it with a fine which may not be higher than 15% of the monthly salary of the employee, in a period of one to six months.  The employee has the right to appeal against the ruling passed by the Minister of the Interior within eight days from the receipt of the ruling. The appeal is submitted to the competent Commission at the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The employee has, at the same time, right to judicial protection, namely the right to institute a procedure before a competent court in the Republic of Macedonia.  The employee who, owing to special diligence and quality in performance of the activities and tasks, significantly contributes to the performance of the functions of the Ministry may be awarded in the amount of up to one monthly salary. Furthermore, the employee who has achieved particular successes and results in the performance of the functions of the Ministry, may be granted awards, letters of appreciation, and recognitions, as set forth by the Rulebook of the Ministry of the Interior on Types and Manner of Granting Awards, Letters of Appreciation and Recognitions, Nos. 16.1-1730 , dated 01.06.2001.  27. Which information do you store and, if yes, who has access to the following data: a) data on persons wanted for extradition; b) data on aliens to whom entry was refused; c) data on missing persons; d) data on persons placed under police protection; e) data on witnesses, on persons summoned to appear before judicial authorities; f) data on persons (or vehicles) for whom there is evidence or reasons to suppose that serious criminal offences will be committed; g) data on objects (stolen vehicles, firearms, documents, banknotes). 
a) Data on persons wanted for extradition The Sector for International Police Cooperation at the Ministry of the Interiorin Republic of Macedonia pursuant to Article 536 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04), keeps several records on issued warrants. Furthermore, the Ministry keeps records on notices on persons who are wanted by Macedonian and foreign judicial bodies, for purposes of extradition. In accordance with the European Convention on Extradition (adopted in 1957 in Paris) in respect of international warrants issued by INTERPOL member-states, accompanied with statements that extradition will be requested for persons who are deprived of liberty, the Sector for International Police Cooperation distributes the issued international warrants to all border crossing points and to all organisational units of the Ministry. In connection with persons wanted by the national judicial bodies, the Sector informs the Section for Searches at the Criminal Police Department at the Ministry of the Interior, where records are kept on such persons, while such warrants are also circulated to all countries – members of INTERPOL. Under the warrants system of the Republic of Macedonia a special reference is made about the concerned person, denoting that in addition to the national level warrant, the person is also wanted under an international warrant.  b) Data on aliens banned from entering the country The Sector for Foreigners and Immigration Issues, at the Ministry of the Interior, in coordination with the border police stations controlling the road and air traffic border crossing points have a legal possibility not to allow entry to an alien, in accordance with the Law on Movement and Residence of Foreigners (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92; 66/92; 26/93 and 45/02). Records are kept on all aliens who are banned from entering the country – a register that contains the data on the person and the reasons owing to which they are under the entry ban. There is also a Register on certain foreign citizens who are subject to the measure of “deprivation of the right to residence” in duration of more than six months. The Sector on Foreigners and Immigration Issues acts in accordance to the Law on Movement and Stay of Aliens and the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/93 and 11/94.) c) Data on the missing persons The Section for Searches at the Criminal Police Department of the Ministry of the Interior keeps records on reported missing persons and corpses of unknown identity. The Section for Searches works in accordance to the Instruction for Undertaking of Search Operations, on Issuance of Central and International Warrants and Notices on Persons and Objects. When reporting a missing person the form Ante Mortem is filled at the Section for Searches, while when finding a corpse of unknown identity the Section for Identification at the Criminal Police Department of the Ministry of the Interior fills in a Post Mortem form. The Section for Searches has a computerised system of records of persons subject to central warrants, records of stolen motor vehicles and records on stolen or lost firearms. d) Data on persons under police protection The issues of data on persons under police protection have not been regulated in the applicable legislation of the Republic of Macedonia thus far, because in the previous practice of the Ministry of the Interior no protection has been provided to witnesses or victims. These issues will be regulated in the new Law on Witness Protection, which is already in the final Parliamentary stage of adoption.  e) Data on witnesses or persons summoned by the court In the practice, in accordance with the Law on Criminal Procedure, data on parties in proceedings (witnesses and other persons) are kept in each case file individually, depending of the stage of the procedure. Such data are located in the Basic Public Prosecutor’s Office, within the Deputy Public Prosecutor's file, while during the investigation the data are within the investigative judge's file and during the hearing, in the sentencing judge's file. f) Data on persons (or vehicles) for which there are reasons to suspect that they are involved in preparation for performance of serious crimes In cases when certain indications and information on persons being potential perpetrators of serious crimes exist, following the police methodology of work, the Ministry of the Interior– Section for Criminal Police - undertakes operative procedures, by which in an organised manner measures are implemented to gather evidence for documenting the unlawful criminal activities. In respect of the institution and implementation of operative procedures, Local and State Registers are kept. However, the data on the persons in respect of whom the procedure is still ongoing are not entered in those Registers. The implementation of Police Reform (see 24_Annex_03) foresees establishment of criminal intelligence database, which will comprise persons regarding whom grounds for suspicion that they prepare, perpetrate or have perpetrated criminal offences in the area of organised crime exist. This database will also comprise information on criminal activities related to passenger motor vehicles and the existing information on vehicles, which are at the moment owned by criminals, and groups organised to perpetrate such type of crimes.  g). Data on objects (stolen vehicles, firearms, documents, banknotes) The Section for Searches at the Criminal Police Department of the Ministry of the Interior also keeps the following records:   Records on stolen and lost weapons;   Records on stolen motor vehicles, which are also kept at the NCB INTERPOL – a database with automated search facility;   Records on certain objects (travel documents). The records on stolen motor vehicles and stolen/lost travel documents, through the NCB INTERPOL Skopje, are entered in the database with automated search facility in the General Secretariat of INTERPOL in Lyon. The Forensic Sector at the Ministry of the Interior keeps records on counterfeited banknotes, which are subject to forensic expertise. There are several types of records:   Records of foreign currencies   Records of nominal value   Records by serial number   Records on organisational units that have requested forensic analysis    Database “Image archive” of non-genuine banknotes   catalogues of genuine banknotes and in certain cases CD-ROMS (database of genuine banknotes) Access to all of these records is granted to the authorised officials working on these issues. 
